The Czech smelter is on the verge of a major comeback.
Pavel Francouz was called up to the NHL
Czech ice hockey goalkeeper Pavel Francouz, who has been going through a difficult period in his career in recent months, is returning to the NHL.
The 33-year-old Pilsen native will be on the bench and could soon get into the goal.
The former Litvínov, Plzeň and Chelyabinsk goalkeeper suffered an injury in training for the NHL in October last year.
He played just over half of the game against Vegas and hasn't been seen on the NHL ice since.
The incident happened when the experienced goalkeeper moved from one post to another.
"Pavel Francouz will be out for approximately three to four weeks with an injury to his lower body," the Denver team announced at the beginning of October.
His return to the NHL lasted more than two months.
On Sunday morning, U.S. time, he was recalled from the farm where he had caught four duels and showed his old form.
In the AHL, 94.5% of the penalties were recorded.
The former Plzeň hockey player wants to finally make his mark and prove that he belongs in the best league in the world.
In the last season, he had problems with his knees and did not play a single game in the shortened pandemic season.
In the NHL, "Franc" has played 36 games, with a save percentage of 92.3%.
Charles gifts Camilla a Christmas present, William and Kate pose in Jordan
Prince William and his wife Kate have chosen a family photo taken during their trip to Jordan as their Christmas wish this year.
Prince Charles also shared his wish, using a photograph of his wife Camilla helping him to put on his robes.
The British news agency BBC reported on its website.
The wishes are sent to friends, colleagues and charities with which they work.
The photographs were taken somewhere in the desert.
The Duchess of Cambridge was dressed in a long summer dress in khaki colour and Princess Charlotte also wore a long summer dress.
Prince William, the Duke of Cambridge, is wearing shorts and a polo shirt with a tie.
Who took the photograph and when it was taken has not been revealed, nor is it clear exactly when it was taken.
Last year the royal family posed for a photograph for their Christmas card in front of a stack of logs in their country estate in Norfolk.
The heir to the throne, Prince Charles, and his wife Camilla have also released a picture to mark the occasion.
Photographer Sam Hussein captured the moment in June at Ascot.
Charles, who has a cylinder on his head and a hat on his face, helps Camille put on her coloured hat to match her bright dress.
According to efotbal.cz, Slavia promised Berbatov a million for the title, Tvrdík denied this.
Prague - The criminal investigators allegedly worked on the assumption that the accused former vice-president of the Czech Football Association Roman Berbr had been promised a million crowns by the Prague Slavia for the league title in the 2018/19 season.
The website efotbal.cz reported that it had obtained a part of the police records.
The president of the Vršovice club, Jaroslav Tvrdík, stated that the red-whites did not commit any corruption.
The server published a transcript of police recordings in which Jan Nezmar, the former sports director of Slavia, is mentioned mainly. He left the club in the summer last year.
The former influential functionary of the red-white party was in regular contact with Berb and with the former sports director of the then second-league Vyšehrad, Roman Rogoz, who is also among the accused in the case.
The police reportedly worked on the basis that Slavia Berbro promised a financial reward for winning the title.
In 2019, the SK Slavia Praha team won the first league title.
The police body had knowledge that Roman (Berbr) would receive a million-crown payment from the SK Slavia Praha officials, the server quoted from the document.
According to the police, Berbr met not only Nezmar, but also the chairman of the board of directors of Slavia, Tvrdík, the next day.
According to the server, the police are still investigating this information.
The accused denied any corrupt practices.
Between 2015 and 2017, we actively tried to change the situation in Czech football and offered an alternative to its development.
We have never committed illegal acts, we have not tried to influence referees in violation of the rules of fair play and we have not provided any financial compensation in this regard," Tvrdík told Seznam Zprávy.
In the recordings, Nezmar does not hesitate to insult some of the former Slavia players and also denigrates his former boss Tvrdik.
The alleged manipulation of matches through referees sparked a police raid in mid-October at several locations, including the FAČR headquarters in Prague.
The highest-ranking figure in the affair is Berbr, who no longer figures in any of the football functions.
In mid-January, just like the former sports director of Vyšehrad Rogoz, he was released from custody.
Helicopters, tanks and BVPs are LARPing the Cold War.
They will be new, but they will be worse (gunners will have to load their weapons manually from an armoured cabin without cover).
The cars - Toyota Hi-Lux - are new and good
The bulldozers and various armoured vehicles - on a good level, and they have managed to get rid of the Praga V3S even from the specialised units.
Aircraft: combat-capable but at the end of the lease, transport - very small with short range but modern.
Drones - few and only small types without combat potential
Missiles - we have none (but we produce and export them)
PVO: Medium - undergraduate, outdated; short range - good, modern, relatively good number.
I have such a story.
Honitbu is right next to the city.
There were beavers in the river and they were causing damage to crops, so I went to deal with them.
When I arrived, I saw that there was a fisherman on the other side of the river.
I didn't want to run a brothel, so I sat quietly and typed and he didn't notice me.
I hoped it would go, but then a mouse came out of nowhere.
I left her at 40 metres before I decided to pull the trigger.
The poor fisherman almost got eaten by a pike, so I called out to him that it was a perch.
Before I got out of bed I was fucked.
That is, a man can be a cuckold.
On the other hand, it is not a war, it would require a lot of coincidences for something to happen, probably you would see a thermal camera, which everyone has today.
So, at the visible places, valuable things should be kept out of the reach of children and you should be safe.
Vojtěch versus Hamáček.
The Ministry of Health has purchased respirators at a much lower price than the Ministry of Health
The state responsible for purchasing and distributing masks, gowns and respirators for the professions closest to the coronavirus has spent millions of crowns on them in recent weeks.
iRozhlas compared the purchases of individual ministries and found that during one day the amounts for respirators varied by hundreds of crowns.
Why have prices moved so dramatically?
Which agencies acted economically?
And why did others buy dráž?
Lenka Kabrhelová is talking to the editor-in-chief of the iRozhlas server, Dominika Kubištová.
I respect the soldiers and the army (I am not affected by memories of the SLA, which older generations have experienced), but the Czech Republic cannot benefit from compulsory military service.
We don't have a lot of modern techniques, we don't have modern techniques for our current professionals, and in addition, modern techniques are getting more and more complicated, so the skills of the reserves will be rapidly lost in time.
There will be very modern conventional conflicts, where you can put whoever you want, and there will be no time for anyone to train again.
And finally, the reserves/territorial defense are of great importance to countries such as Ukraine, where it is necessary to conduct a large-scale operation and it is a stated necessity to remove the enemy.
In the Czech Republic, a war of this scale and intensity can only be waged in a conflict zone where guerrilla warfare will be irrelevant, and we do not have the right geography for this.
We don't have individual skills.
It's not even the worst.
The worst thing is that half of them play as if they didn't have it.
Then there comes a situation where you're looking at a guy who didn't hit the empty door 2 minutes ago, drives into the attack himself, or even two or three Swiss, and you say to yourself, "What the hell am I going to do now?"
Of course, they will take him as an average tax payer.
That situation with this player "to take over" is so frightening that I was surprised when I saw that our attacker managed to outwit one of the opponent's players.
First impressions
The Covid pandemic is slowing things down, but experts are not expecting any major changes in the coming weeks.
Hospitalizations according to statistical models are expected to persist for some time, and the pandemic equation has, as we know, added a new unknown: the omikron variant, which is very likely to spread faster than the currently dominant Delta.
It is also not possible to say with absolute certainty whether it can cause more serious course of the disease, to what extent vaccination or post-infection immunity acquired before the disease can help against it.
However, this week has also seen an unexpected phenomenon on the plus side: the possibility of treatment.
A new drug, molnupiravir, has arrived in the Czech Republic, which reduces the risk of severe course of the disease and associated hospitalization by a third and can be treated at home.
And soon, it will also be supplemented by the drug paxlovid from the Pfizer company, which has reported a success rate of 85 percent to date.
The first deliveries of molnupiravir to the Czech Republic, however, have not only raised hopes of expanding the portfolio of tools useful in the fight against the coronavirus pandemic, but have also highlighted the question of how the local administration is prepared for the arrival of new drugs.
As mentioned, the first Czech patients will receive molnupiravir from Merck.
The company ended up on the path as the first because the drug was developed long before the current pandemic, with the aim of finding a suitable treatment for viral equine diseases in South America.
This research is often overlooked that people in the West (Germany, Sweden, etc.)
They are generally less open and less willing to share their views.
On the other hand, Eastern Europeans, and especially us Czechs, are used to saying "as the crow flies".
You can do a survey where you ask people if they like Muslims.
In the Czech Republic, most people will tell you no.
In the West, they will tell you how much they love migration, how everyone should help them and how we, the Czechs, are a racist bunch.
And then they go and vote for the AfD.
He is afraid of the cancel culture, saying it means losing his job and a media lynching.
Then, in polls, it looks good in the west, bad in the east.
But they will find out what people think.
Le Pen and Zemmour both have more than 20% according to a poll.
We even know that the objects are three and completely identical.
Identical because of the rotation of units, so that the soldiers do not have to learn where everything is again, all objects on the field are the same.
One is the Atom Museum in Brdy and the other two are abandoned.
The irony is that the USSR did not want to have nuclear warheads on its own territory, either for security or for the speed of deployment, given its western location.
Only the heads were stored in the underground chambers (there are two in each yew), not the entire rocket as it is said.
If it was necessary to use this weapon, a special unit arrived, which picked up the head and mounted it on some kind of support.
In addition, the remaining yew trees are in a sorry state.
In the second grade of primary school, we had a classmate who was a Gypsy, and we were with him for four years.
He was a bit of a character, made some good plays, was a bit over the top at times, but he was our mascot.
He was known to everyone, he often went out and wanted to explain something, he was rarely wrong, he walked regularly, he did sports with us, he didn't steal food, he didn't steal phones, he walked in clean clothes.
He went to nature schools, did all sorts of monkey business, but was happy, never any trouble.
In the eighth or ninth grade, the siblings went to the same class, and the gypsies went to a different class.
Shortly afterwards, the teacher was attacked, often by the police, they threatened and harassed other students.
I personally sell things from time to time (old things, things I don't need, etc.) and I have sold to the Gypsies many times, they always had money, they didn't try to bargain, the communication was quiet.
I even sold a car like that, a boy called me after a month saying that he had already paid for it.
I myself say that I am not a racist, it does not matter to me if someone is white, black, yellow, blue or whatever, as long as they behave in a decent society (works, functions, women are not beaten, just normal behavior).
But whoever comes, he stretches out his hand, he rents flats and houses, he has no order around him, he causes problems... so it doesn't matter what colour he is, it will bother me.
I have no problem with African migrants if they come here and start working, learning our language (not necessarily, at least English), and respecting our culture.
If you believe in God, I don't care, as long as you respect my traditions and culture, I'll respect yours.
Young woman dies in crash on Prachatice road
"The young woman suffered serious multiple injuries and despite resuscitation efforts she died at the scene of her injuries," said a spokeswoman for the South Bohemian rescue service, Zuzana Fajtlová.
The accident was probably caused by the driver who took the girl.
The 18-year-old driver of a Peugeot vehicle was probably driving in the direction from the village of Žíchovec to the village of Bavorov and for as yet unknown reasons, the vehicle went into a bend in the opposite direction.
After the collision with the Skoda Octavia, the Peugeot vehicle ended up on the roof of the road, police spokeswoman Štěpánka Schwarzová described.
The young Peugeot driver suffered very serious injuries in the accident.
He suffered multiple injuries and was trapped in the vehicle.
He was given urgent pre-hospital care and was transported by helicopter to a hospital in Czech Budějovice, the rescue worker Fajtlová stated.
She added that the man in the second vehicle suffered minor injuries to his chest and was taken to hospital.
New rules apply to packages from countries outside the EU, but customers often fail to provide details
Lukáš Neuheisl orders from abroad several times a month.
It mainly collects collector cards.
"It's usually in the hundreds, say from ten dollars up, where it's still worthwhile to import, especially from Japan where the post is often free," the collector explains.
Since October, ordering small parcels has become slightly more expensive, and now they have to add VAT and hand over details for customs control.
He will get an email saying that customs are expecting a parcel.
All you have to do is fill in the details of the consignor and if the DPH did not include the trader in the sale, the customs office will calculate the total amount for the consignment and for the transport.
If the recipient does not arrange customs clearance themselves, they must also add the carrier's fee to the total amount.
According to Lukáš Neuheisl, however, the whole process is not complicated.
I click one or two delete buttons, add two attachments and I'm done.
For me, it's mostly a question of five minutes, says Neuheisl.
However, not all deliveries go smoothly.
Due to the new customs regulations, the daily number of incoming letters from abroad has dropped from 60,000 to 15,000.
In addition, the Czech Post says that the problem is also that people do not respond to requests to provide the information needed to complete customs proceedings.
Currently, there are 30,000 letters in international mail that we have to process.
If people filled in all the information that is needed and filled it in on time, we would be about halfway there, says Matyáš Vitík, a spokesman for Czech Post.
Inflation solution
See the titles to see how you would propose a solution to the current inflation.
Currently, we are at 9.9% inflation and it is expected to rise further.
What should be done, according to you, to slow down or compensate for this growth?
We see, for example, a reduction in VAT on food and PHM, is this the way for you?
What do you think will happen, what is inevitable with where it is going?
Prices are rising faster than wages, and it is inevitable that people will not be able to afford basic things, especially energy.
How much did you get, for example, added (who is the employee)?
This year they added 2% in gross, which is an insult, but fortunately I have a similar income from my business that I run alongside my employment.
Could someone explain why convicted violent offenders are being locked up for just six months?
I just don't understand how a court can sentence an animal to six months imprisonment just so it can do it all over again as soon as it gets out.
Six months is nothing in comparison to the trauma his/her victim will have for years to come, negatively affecting his/her sexual and overall relationships.
And that's not to mention the fact that the victim of rape doesn't have to relive it.
Will this dissuade potential future reports of rape of the victims?
Man from Hrob "set fire" to his girlfriend from Kostomlat
The man from the Graveyard unwittingly helped the guards secure his wanted girlfriend from Kostomlat, who was issued a warrant for her arrest.
He himself called for it.
But he went ahead anyway.
First, he approached a passerby and concocted a story that he had been mugged.
Officers raced to the scene after receiving a 999 call but were left stunned when the alleged "victim" told them he'd made it all up to get officers to the scene.
In fact, he only wanted to ask the officers how to report to the Czech Police.
When officers checked the man's identity, they discovered that the woman was a person of interest in a nationwide manhunt and a warrant for her arrest had been issued.
The Czech Republic is dealing with the case.
A straightforward question for people here, do you consider our country to be Slavic?
Personally, I think that the Slavs are no longer ethnically or culturally distinct, but I would like to hear your opinion.
Of course, I agree with him, it's a shame that Churchill failed to secure the liberation of Prague for the USA :')
Of course, I do not deny that we have a Slavic language.
I don't know, it's a bit of a question whether a rational person can really believe something without evidence just because it might be beneficial.
I would not consider such a case to be right.
I can't agree with Pascal here, there are at least 10,000 different religions in the world, if you don't count them.
Which god or gods should one then choose?
I would say it's quite likely that at least one of those thousand religions has a god who will kick your ass if you believe in another god.
But even in the 10th commandment it stands that there is no other god but Jahve.
So, in that case, it would be more rational to not believe in any god than to risk choosing the wrong one from thousands of gods and end up in hell or some other place?
Others: Voluntary training followed by enrolment in the reserve.
The Swiss model is similar.
10 months of training (in different specializations, 10 months for one) and under the supervision of professional instructors with practical experience.
If you do it well, you can get a professional offer.
Such a thing would suit all the components of the Czech Republic.
It could be done in cooperation with the Defence University.
We can talk about this: The cooperation between the education sector and industry is constantly being undermined, companies are fishing in schools, and there is some kind of cross-fertilization, where the workforce migrates from educational institutions to employment.
Not only during adolescence, but this process is ongoing, we are constantly learning new things, moving from one field to another, etc.
Similar cross-fertilization should work between the civilian and military sectors.
I see it as a way of building a relationship between the citizen and the army, which is an institution that guarantees that it will never be invaded by Russians, Germans or even Mongol invaders.
It's funny how you view NATO as a stone that has been carved, we have allies and they will defend us if there is an attack.
No, I'm sorry.
One election in the USA which turns their budget and NATO goes into a tailspin.
The English will exchange us for Russian dirt, the Germans for Russian gas, and the Poles have already shown that they can take what they want by showing their backsides.
The only thing that has consistently worked as a guarantee of independence is an armed population that can master the military technology of its time.
And today, every teenager can pilot a remote-controlled device, so what's the problem?
We don't need border fortifications, that's today's fashion, but a teenager with a remote-controlled device can handle it.
How to survive a box-tsunami
You open the gifts under the Christmas tree and suddenly you have a house full of boxes and stuffing?
This "waste" is being used by e-shops, which lack packaging materials.
That's why there's a map of shops that will accept your used boxes.
And not just for Christmas.
All packaging materials are designed to withstand repeated handling.
That is why it is a shame to treat them as if they were one-off rubbish.
Anyone can bring cardboard boxes, plastic or paper inserts to the participating business (the map of the KAMsNIM.cz project contains nearly 150 of them).
This will help small businesses, reduce the amount of waste created and also avoid the overfilled blue containers.
The shops themselves are also welcoming the packaging, which is currently in short supply on the market, as well as the saved money, as the cardboard box has increased in price by 50% over the last few years.
In addition, I am strengthening my brand in the eyes of ecologically-minded customers.
One such company is TIERRA VERDE, a producer of eco-friendly cosmetics and eco-friendly toiletries.
The boxes and filler materials are delivered to Popůvky by individuals, but we also hear from companies with which we have regular deliveries of cardboard boxes.
We will use this to pack our e-shop's deliveries.
Individually and collectively, we are creating a more considerate world.
Our wish is to preserve the resources and beauty of nature for future generations, says Petra Lopušníková from Tierry.
The www.KAMsNIM.cz application, however, does not only show collection points for packaging materials.
It serves as a search engine if you need to get rid of anything (sorted household waste, old medicines, tyres, used electrical appliances, batteries, light sources, large household waste, etc.).
All the waste can then go to the right place, and reusable items will find their second home.
The map of the project contains more than 100,000 such places.
"Slowly, collection points, re-use centres, textile containers, food banks, charity shops, SWAPs and other places that help to find a use for things that would otherwise become waste are popping up," says Miroslav Kubásek, one of the app's authors from the Ukliďme Česko association.
I think it's a shame that in today's day and age, technology is so simple and intuitive that children who use a computer or phone play games on it, but they don't learn the basic computer skills.
Recently there has been a problem (mainly in English articles) that university students do not understand the principles of components on a computer.
Because apps like Google Photos or Apple's photo apps or even mobile phones in general just hide the underlying filesystem with components and everything is laid out on one screen in the app.
It's fine to use techniques from childhood, but above all, to learn something.
Rewrite history, seriously
Emmanuel Macron presented the priorities of the French presidency of the EU - which begins in January - and it was impressive.
Macron spoke for an hour, revealing the logo of the presidency, calling for the protection of Europeans - in the workplace and on the street - and mentioning so many actions that it would be impossible to list them all in half a year.
But French politicians love it and so do the voters.
Macron supporters who support a shift to the right and left agree on little, but yes, on Europe.
And in France, new presidential elections will be held in April.
The election calendar has also affected priorities.
The French leader mentioned that historians should write "one history of Europe" and France is ready to provide the conditions for such a history to be written by historians.
Several commentators have already criticised Macron's pro-European propaganda and his rewriting of history.
In fact, it is trying to rewrite history in order to protect it.
The far-right presidential candidate Éric Zemmour is currently touring France with the message that the Vichy regime, which collaborated with Hitler during World War II, was not so bad and has a lot of success with the French.
Let's take Macron's idea of a history textbook seriously and not pay attention to what's happening in France.
Would it not be necessary?
Students in European countries are taught history as a story of us versus them, never as a story of the whole.
Spaniards, French, Czechs learn who defeated whom in which battle.
But if they don't have an enlightened rabbi, they won't know the wider context of the event.
The film of the year is Quo Vadis, Aida?
The Czech "mice" did not win.
The story, which returns to the Srebrenica massacre of 1995, also won awards for direction and best actress Jasna Duričić.
It was at the top of the viewer's ranking at this year's Karlovy Vary International Film Festival.
The best actor in Berlin was Anthony Hopkins for Father.
I'm not very young, I'm not very healthy/fit and I'm not vaccinated.
It was like "having a cold/being sick" For a few days I had diarrhea and didn't feel like smoking...
It was worse than the common flu.
I don't have a cold.
(Just my personal experience. I don't claim that everyone has this)
Christmas book recommendations
The Christmas double issue, which comes out on December 20, will contain a traditional literary supplement.
And along with it, cultural tips.
We are also offering you, subscribers, the option to purchase the book as a Christmas gift.
The prose texts follow on from the previous similar collection by Petříček Sellier & Petříček Bellot.
Another portion of observing the world and describing everyday things with an extraordinary poetic sensibility, depth and atmosphere.
In his second novel, photographer Šesták tried to capture the essence of the small town and Czech society.
A story of returning to the roots that turns out to be just an illusion.
The bohemist and the comparatist transfer the story of the Red Carnation into the setting of a contemporary village.
Her performance surpasses the folk version and graduates into a horror of emotional emptiness.
And that the path back to instincts is shorter than one is willing to admit
In his penultimate novel, he tells a less sentimental story of return from exile than we have become accustomed to hearing.
Those who stayed and those who left know too little about each other to make common life possible.
Trains will start running according to the new timetable, some transport companies will change
From Sunday, trains will start running according to the new timetable on the railway.
The biggest change is the replacement of the operators on some routes, for example between Ústí nad Labem and Kolín, where instead of Czech Railways, RegioJet will start operating.
For the majority of lines, only the departure time is changed, and sometimes the route as well.
There will also be dozens of new trains on the tracks.
The transport companies started selling tickets already during the autumn.
The Czech Railways plan to run an average of 6,783 passenger trains per day in the new timetable, of which an average of 478 will be long-distance trains.
Trains will travel approximately 118 million kilometres during the new timetable.
The trains will also run to Germany, Poland, Slovakia, Hungary, Austria and Switzerland within the new timetable.
The company is introducing dozens of new trains in conjunction with the new timetable.
The main novelty will be InterJet trains, which will run on lines from Prague to Cheb.
The operator will also run new trains in northern Moravia and in western Bohemia.
The transport company will also raise fares from next year by an average of 3.2 percent.
Railways take inflation into account in their tariffs every year.
The biggest change in the RegioJet timetable is the introduction of the R23 Ústí nad Labem – Mělník – Nymburk – Kolín line.
The operator will replace České dráhy here after winning the transport ministry competition.
RegioJet will run 16 trains per day on the line, eight in each direction.
Further changes will affect long-distance trains between Prague and Brno, which will also stop at Havlíčkův Brod, Žďár nad Sázavou and Kolín from Sunday.
Leo Express will keep its 16 services, two return services to Slovakia and also the weekend service to Krakow.
According to Emil Sedlářík, the carrier is also trying to maintain as similar as possible the journey times of its long-distance trains despite the planned track works.
Services on the Arriva and other operators' trains are expected to continue as normal.
The operator will also change on some regional lines.
Travellers will also see changes, for example in Česká Lípa, where instead of Czech Railways, trains will run from Mladá Boleslav to Rumburk operated by Trilex, a German company Die Länderbahn.
Travellers will also be able to use the single fare on the railway for a second year.
Like Czech Railways, its price will increase by 3.2 percent due to inflation.
I disagree.
Are we learning to see things from the other side?
Everywhere we hear how much they had to fight for their rights, how they were oppressed and had to act, how they died.
In my life I have never heard teaching from the perspective of the slave owner or from that time, nobody defends that, just condemns it.
No one tells you in school that blacks often sold each other into slavery and that they were often the worst slave masters.
Nobody teaches you in school that the colonizers often bought land from the Indians, and all they tell you is how brutally we, the Europeans, killed them, while we were killing each other for a long time.
I have also spent some time in the United States, at schools both in the north and in the south.
I have not come across anyone who has deliberately covered up facts, but I have heard that it is happening and I do not deny that it is a problem (for example, in Japan, WW2 war crimes are quite taboo).
My point was more that history is not black and white and that we tend to look at it from today's perspective without understanding.
History is not interesting to me, it's just what it is and I think it's a fatal error to judge without looking at things from the perspective of the time.
On the other hand, we should learn from this and never repeat it.
By the way, while we are talking about the southern states, yes, the Confederate flag and the famous slave owners are quite popular there, on the other hand, they did have some good achievements and it seems absurd to me to reject them.
Moreover, the North was not much better than it is today, as many people idealise it.
And a lot of people forget that not everyone in the South was a slave owner and there were a lot of things that they fought against.
I would not compare this with the Russians, they deliberately omit some facts, lie and manipulate, moreover, our view of them does not exist (there was also a video from television, where someone started talking about our legionnaires and 1968).
What I found appalling at US schools was the rise of Marxism and the idealization of communism, something that never happened in their country.
Overall, I felt that at some universities it was shocking, that the students were so radicalised, and that the schools had supported them so many times.
And when I imagine that these people will one day be much older, I find it a little disconcerting that this could be the voice of the majority, because it is among the young and in the ruling elite.
I think that feminism has already achieved what it set out to achieve, and it is no longer about the same thing. It has become radicalised.
Nowadays, feminists are those who have nothing to do with it and ignore the basic biological facts, just like other groups such as LGBT, which leads to radicalisation on both sides, where it often leads to resistance to quite reasonable things.
And the more radical someone is, the more you hear them.
At the end of the day, I have not come across anyone who has condemned me for colonialism or slavery.
I met bad geography, but it was mutual :D
Not because I don't like it, but because it is completely pointless to me.
I'm proud of something I couldn't do myself?
In addition, I consider the concept of nationality to be unnecessary from the point of view of any personal identity.
If something connects me with people, the world and shared experiences, not where I was born.
I'm not a believer, but from what I know, I can say this: We have two Greek Catholic parishes, one is Ukrainian and the other is Slovak.
This Slovak priest is a really nice guy, he preaches more about theology than politics, but always manages to throw in a bit about the coronavirus, that everyone is embarrassed about.
Then there is of course the Czechoslovak Hussite Church.
Officially they are Protestants, but in fact they are born out of the Catholic modernism and are actually Catholics without the Pope.
I know a lot of Catholics who go to Protestant services because it's theologically very similar, but the members are usually more liberal.
They have a beautiful and historically very valuable functionalist church on Botanická Street.
Otherwise, the Church of St. Michael on the Dominican Square is under the Dominicans, and every Sunday at 15:00 they celebrate mass in Latin, just as they did before Vatican II.
The Bethlehem star is in the Czech Republic, the scouts took it from Austria
Břeclav - the nativity scene in Bethlehem, where according to Christian tradition Jesus Christ was born, is in the Czech Republic.
The scouts did not go to Vienna due to the coronavirus pandemic, but their Austrian colleagues picked them up at the Reintal - Breclav border crossing in the morning.
It was also taken by loners last year.
The Bethlehem light is a beautiful Christmas tradition that we always take part in, and we are looking forward to it.
I am honoured to have been chosen, said Amálie Budíková, the scout.
Last year, the handover took place at the Mikulov-Drasenhofen border crossing, directly on the border bridge, but now at the Reintal-Břeclav border crossing at the car park.
But usually scouts go to Vienna by train.
Nothing changes in the distribution of the fire across the Czech Republic.
The scouts traditionally travel to Brno by train, where they hand over the Bethlehem light to the bishop of the diocese, Vojtěch Cikrle.
The subsequent delivery of the light will be handled by the scouts on Saturday 18 December, who will travel by selected high-speed trains and personal trains.
The light will be taken by local scouts or volunteers, who will then spread it across the Czech Republic, even to places where trains do not go.
This year, the scouts must also follow the valid measures against the spread of the coronavirus.
It is the same as last year.
We recommend both courier teams and local event organizers to of course wear masks, try to keep a distance, there should be as few of them as possible, do not sing with colleagues, just behave in such a way as to make it as safe as possible, said the spokesperson for the Bethlehem Light event, Zuzana Hrbková.
The tradition of the Bethlehem lights, which travels around Europe, was born in 1986 in Austria.
The aim is to spread the idea of a room, friendship and peace at the same time.
The light of Bethlehem is a symbol of hope, a light that overcomes the darkness.
In the Czech Republic, the spread of the disease has been taken care of by scouts and scouts for more than 30 years.
The action is supported by hundreds of volunteers, and the candles are also a symbol of compassion and humanity.
All the latest news, including a list of places where people can go to get a light, can be found on the website www.betlemskesvetlo.cz.
I don't have an economic education, so I don't know the basics of economics that would confirm that subsidies are a cancer on the economy, but I don't think that the subsidies as a whole would be a problem.
The development of infrastructure, ecology (e.g. water retention), healthcare and education will properly use the money, but I don't understand why the money is being spent on agriculture, industry and firms in general.
As mentioned - it produces unnecessary products and damages the free market and "natural life of the company".
I work in a factory where there are million posters "xy financed/co-financed by project xy" and such a company is just artificially kept alive.
This is not support for a company that is giving jobs to x people, this is the development of a company that is holding on tight and taking orders/employees away from firms that could grow and be more productive after its demise.
Total agreement, it's terrifying.
Even people born in the Internet age sometimes get caught up in some trick or trap - especially advertising.
I think online adverts don't really affect me, but then again, I'm the same as everyone else - it's just so intrusive that you can't help but be affected by it.
For this reason, I support the radical voices in the European Parliament who are currently calling for a complete ban on programmatic advertising...
It's all a scam, in the words of a classic - I would ban those internet sites.
I feel that this virus has its roots in (but mainly in point 1):
1. "I will not believe anything that most people believe and it makes sense, I am not a sheep, but I would rather believe something that is less likely, it doesn't make sense, but it is important that I have my own original opinion about which I will insist is critical thinking."
2. "I won't believe everything the media say"
3. "I don't believe politicians"
Television has fallen out of the Christmas film trend, with 200 films premiering this year
Los Angeles - TV networks and streaming platforms in the United States and other English-speaking countries have fallen out of the Christmas film trend, and this year they will present their viewers with a record-breaking more than two hundred.
The operator of the film database IMDb calculated this.
The genre of Christmas family and romantic films has been popular with the public in recent years and has significantly increased the number of viewers, so more and more of these films are being made.
This year, there have been four times as many Christmas films as in 2011 and twice as many as five years ago.
The IMDb database, however, only includes films with the word Christmas in their titles, so there will be a lot more Christmas films.
Christmas movies have always been around.
In the Czech Republic, this period is associated with fairy tales, and globally, films such as Home Alone, Love in the Sky, or the classic Christmas story Life is Beautiful from 1946 are also popular.
But the real boom in Christmas pictures started only in 2009, when the American cable television network Hallmark launched a special film series, according to the BBC.
Her advent project called Countdown to Christmas (Countdown to Christmas) then included four films and was very successful.
This station started its viewers on Christmas on October 22 and will present a total of 42 Christmas films.
Lifetime's rival channel, Lifetime, has 35 new Christmas movies this year, and popular streaming platforms like Netflix are also contributing to the total.
"In this magical period of the story, it doesn't really matter, what's important is that there's a lot of Christmas trees in the background and it's snowing," said Brandon Gray, author of the book I'll Be Home for Christmas Movies.
"It's an escape and a way to feel a little bit of calm in the midst of all the holiday madness and insanity of the world we've been living in," Gray added.
According to him, for example, the Hallmark television channel uses the same recipe for its films, which is uniform but successful.
You have two people who fall in love, but then about half an hour before the end there's some misunderstanding, but it's resolved and the two of them fall in love.
It's like this all over again, and as long as all the films look the same and have the same atmosphere, people will follow one after another, says Gray.
Mazepin had a positive test for Covid-19 and will not take part in the final Formula 1 race.
Only nineteen drivers will take part in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix in Formula 1.
Nikita Mazepin had a positive COVID-19 test and will miss the final race of the season.
Haas will only run one car on the track.
In the last race of the season he was aiming for a better position from 20th on the grid.
However, Russian Nikita Mazepin from the Haas team will not take part in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix.
He had tested positive for Covid-19.
Only nineteen cars will appear on the starting grid, with the last-place starter Mick Schumacher, a teammate of Mazepin, and the first, Max Verstappen, who will compete with Lewis Hamilton in a direct battle for the title.
Mazepin is according to Haas' statement in relatively good shape and does not show any signs.
Nikita is physically fine as he was asymptomatic.
It is now in isolation and will be governed by the relevant public health authorities, with safety being the top priority for all involved," Formula 1 said in a statement on formula1.com.
Haas is not sending its reserve driver to the race, nor can it.
The replacement rider would have to complete a qualification or ride in another part of the weekend.
The first athlete does not have COVID-19.
Kimi Räikkönen, who was just about to finish the season, had covid-19, last year Sergio Pérez and Lewis Hamilton were tested positive.
They can also lock you up for this.
And everyone will be robbed, the boss said.
In terms of the law, Covid is a notifiable disease.
So it's in the same group as HIV, flu, measles or whooping cough.
§ 152 Spreading of Infectious Human Diseases
(1) Whoever intentionally causes or increases the risk of the introduction or spread of a contagious disease among people will be punished with imprisonment for a term of six months to three years, a ban on activities, or the deprivation of property.
(2) The perpetrator will be sentenced to two to eight years in prison.
c) fails to comply with an obligation arising from his employment, profession, position or function or imposed on him by law.
d) causes serious harm to health.
(3) The perpetrator will be sentenced to three to ten years' imprisonment if the act specified in paragraph 1 causes serious injury to health to at least two persons or death.
(4) The perpetrator will be sentenced to imprisonment for five to twelve years if the act specified in paragraph 1 causes the death of at least two people.
Quiz: Why failing companies often have women at the helm and what they never want to be
The gender pay gap, or the so-called gender pay gap, is one of the highest in the EU in the Czech Republic.
In which country are the differences greatest?
And in which age group and in which industry do women earn the least amount of money?
Check out what you know about unequal pay.
Gold, silver and 150 diamonds: The price of the most expensive necklace will shock you!
It's a bit like a portable jewellery box, and the creator put in half a year's work and all his savings into it.
"I had a vision of what I wanted to create, but little experience, here at home, the lanterns never really worked," admits Lebanon, who spent 3,000 hours on his project over the course of a year.
The silk was bought in Italy, the 24-carat gold thread in France and the Swarovski crystals were added by the company.
The silver stars were then adorned with 150 diamonds.
"The basis is wool and cotton, but silk adds lightness," the creator praises his work, which, however, does not recommend ironing.
And it has one more twist.
"I'm completely out of my mind, I have to sell it as soon as possible," admits Lebanon.
If it succeeds, it will set a world record.
The most expensive apartment sold five years ago was only CZK 720,000.
If MZ is detached from reality and doesn't matter much - let it leak and replace it with a new one.
The fact is that the departure of FB from Europe would help its non-Russian parts (which are under the influence of a curse).
I think it would clean up the social climate quite a bit.
It would also be better to clarify the channels of "brotherly assistance from the Soviet Union" to some of our political parties and representatives.
Then, people who are choosing should also have a clear idea of whose interests they are actually taking care of.
Shame they don't also own TikTok.
Many teenagers would suddenly realise that the sun was shining outside...
Trump directly called for the persecution of the accused, picking them out.
On the situation in the USA with the leading African-American reporter.
In the United States, new cases of police brutality are emerging, this time during nationwide protests.
Protests that erupted after a white police officer killed unarmed black man, George Floyd, during a traffic stop have sparked a debate about systemic racism, police work and instances of brutality against black Americans.
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks to one of the leading African-American journalists, The Atlantic reporter Adam Serwer.
But what would that increase in funding do?
The EU gives us subsidies.
If it stops doing that, we won't have the money.
I really don't see how it would stop us from using the money for something else...
You can argue that the money from those grants could be used more effectively, but that's a completely different discussion.
Is it possible that a business doesn't pay taxes?
Is it possible that a business is evading taxes?
After all, if some piece of meat goes through a veterinary check, it must be recorded somewhere and it can't just disappear, can it?
Prazdroj and Jelínek do not produce special alcohol for the black market.
However, I often don't get a receipt or they take it away and throw it away.
The government approved the deployment of up to 150 troops to help Poland.
Adventurers, explorers and drone pilots could set off before Christmas, with the mission approved for six months.
They are helping their Polish colleagues to protect the border with Belarus and to build the planned fence.
Poland has officially requested NATO assistance in connection with the several months-long actions of the Belarusian regime, which has lured citizens of neighboring countries to its territory with the false promise of an easy crossing of the EU border.
British and Estonian troops are already operating in Polish territory.
Is the Omikron mutation spreading in southern Moravia?
The hygiene service is investigating another case of a child from Adamovo.
"Currently, we have another suspicion of this variant in another child from Adamov, from the preparatory class.
There is no direct contact with previous cases from Adamov elementary school," said Ciupek.
In the past week, six cases have been reported in the region.
"We are still waiting for official confirmation of the variant in our six cases - this is being done by the National Reference Laboratory for Influenza and Non-influenza Viruses at the State Institute of Public Health in Prague," the director said.
She added that it was two nurses from the University Hospital in Brno and two children of one of them, as well as two 11-year-olds from the Adamov elementary school.
There is no connection between the cases from Brno and Adamov.
Three of them have mild symptoms, four are asymptomatic.
No one with suspicions of Omikron abroad
None of the individuals travelled abroad, nor did anyone from their families, and there has been no contact with anyone who has been abroad.
There is no connection to the water polo world championships for any of the people mentioned, said Ciupek.
The head of hygiene, Pavla Svrčinová, previously stated that an international water polo tournament, which took place in Brno a few weeks ago, is being investigated.
Players from South Africa and one Belgian player fell ill on it.
California will restrict gun sales.
It wants to follow the example of Texas in banning abortions.
California Gov. Gavin Newsom announced Saturday a plan to ban the sale and manufacture of some firearms in the nation's most populous state using a legal mechanism similar to one used by Texas in its controversial fetal heartbeat law.
People would then have a right to compensation in any lawsuit against anyone who manufactures or sells assault weapons or homemade firearms in California.
Newsom's announcement comes in response to Friday's ruling by the U.S. Supreme Court, which upheld a nearly 50-year-old precedent that established a nationwide right to abortion up until the 24th week of pregnancy.
However, the court did not rule on the constitutionality of the entire law, but rather on a technical issue arising from the innovative construction of the measure.
The lawsuit was therefore made public, which prevented the Texas Republicans from suing him in the usual way.
"I am heartened by yesterday's (Wednesday's) ruling by the Supreme Court of the United States that upheld Texas' ban on most abortions and largely supported Texas' effort to protect its law," the California governor said.
"If states can now block review of their laws by federal courts, then California will use that authority to protect human life," Newsom continued.
His subordinates were reportedly instructed to work with the state legislature and the justice minister to draft legislation that would allow the attorney general to seek bans on assault weapons and so-called ghost guns.
They are referred to as home-made weapons that do not have serial numbers and can be used to circumvent regulations.
Newsom wants to give "private citizens" the right to sue for at least $10,000 (about 220,000 crowns) and court costs from anyone who manufactures, distributes or sells assault weapons, parts for "ghost guns" or kits for their manufacture in California.
"If the most effective way to keep these horrible weapons out of our streets is to create a threat of private lawsuits, then we should do that," the California governor said.
The AP notes that California has banned the manufacture and sale of some military-style weapons for nearly a decade, but a federal judge blocked the state's ban as unconstitutional in June.
If the state were to reinstate the death penalty using a Texas template, it would confirm the words of liberal Supreme Court Justice Sonia Sotomayor, who in a dissenting opinion warned of the expansion of the death penalty to other states.
However, the Supreme Court did not grant complete immunity to Texas' abortion restrictions, allowing abortion clinics to continue to sue the state over the measure.
Every emergency vaccination has its public testing phase, where the vaccination schedule is gradually worked out and the vaccines themselves are improved based on the results.
For example, Israel is already conducting a large-scale study on the effects of four doses.
And according to these studies, in most patients, antibody levels go up fivefold, which has a long-term effect.
It will have its own vaccination schedule like every other vaccine, but it's just too early for that.
Another fact is that a new vaccine based on inactivated virus is expected to hit the market soon, which according to the manufacturer's specifications promises up to 10 times greater efficacy.
It's fine to leave a lot of books.
But to re-evaluate CO is to learn.
Since the days of Marie-Thérèse, our civilization and technology have progressed so much that keeping a phone book and writing notes in a notebook makes little sense and is a waste of time.
In these things, it would be a brutal take-away.
On the other hand, how many people leave the school with some basic financial literacy?
And what other things will be absolutely necessary for life?
How can I legally watch the Champions League online?
Do you know if there is any online service in the Czech Republic that would allow me to watch the Champions League for a fee?
We have Netbox and pay for the sports package for the Spanish and English football leagues.
However, it does not include the UEFA Champions League.
I think O2 offers the Champions League, but I don't want to change my TV and internet provider.
Poland threatened to withhold payments to the EU budget
According to Ziobra, the European Commission would be acting in contravention of the law if it used its new powers to suspend payments to Poland over the rule of law dispute.
The Commission has postponed the approval of the Polish plan to draw 36 billion euros from the EU Recovery Fund to revive the economy hit by the covid-19 pandemic.
And it is under pressure from the European Parliament to go further and use the mechanism to claw back EU funding from countries that breach the principle of the rule of law.
"Poland should respond to this EU diktat by vetoing all issues that require unanimity," said Ziobro, head of the small Solidarity Poland party, which would lose a narrow majority in parliament without its votes.
"Poland should also consider its commitments in the EU energy and climate policy, which leads to a drastic increase in energy prices," Ziobro added.
If the case continues, I will ask Poland to stop its contributions to the EU.
This would be justified given that the EU is unlawfully denying us access to funds from the common budget, which we also contribute to, added the Polish minister.
His party's stance on the EU is more radical than the ruling Law and Justice party.
According to the European Commission, the changes made to the Polish justice system during Ziobro's tenure threaten its independence and subordinate it to politicians.
According to Ziobro, Brussels is imposing "impossible conditions, because its goal is not a legal state, but a change of government in Poland."
Warsaw is facing a "political dictatorship imposed by intimidation and an attempt to overturn the democratic decision of several million Poles," Ziobro also said.
He said Poland should be a member of such an EU that is based on the partnership of sovereign states, and not on the government of the strongest and the Brussels bureaucracy, which is not under democratic control.
He said his party would never agree to such concessions to Brussels, which would limit Poland's sovereignty.
"We will never agree to Poland being a colony," he said.
But it's hard to recognize that... In Lidl we have one type of cheese in four different places.
I didn't look for anything else, I've met yogurt so many times, I just needed cheese, Parmigiano Reggiano, after ten minutes I gave up at the dairy counter and asked.
They did, it's true, have all the chosen, less common and special cheeses in that narrow sector, but it was between the vegetables and the lactose-free zone...
If I can't get out, I won't go to any markets or shops, the golden shop on the square doesn't have such a selection, but they do have everything I need and they have it in order, so in ten minutes I'm done.
To Lidlu so that I can take a holiday.
And it doesn't bother me at all.
I've been watching for two years how they deal with data like manure, the majority of the anti-vaxxers are just a little bit more out of the mainstream than the majority of the pro-vaxxers.
Rational discussion is taking place at a professional level, but extreme views are being presented to the public.
They are constantly moving from one wall to another.
Binary thinking: Vaccines will save us, vaccines are useless.
Everything banned, everything allowed.
Colorful cakes instead of robust analysis.
Comparing apples with pears.
That's the way it is for them and that's the way it is for us.
But the data collection method is different in those two states, and no one is addressing that.
Fuj, I was relieved.
Sorry for the disturbance and I wish you all a nice day.
As a child, they beat me with a pot.
It was never about the stamps, mostly it was just that I repeatedly refused to listen and got annoyed (I read instead of going to sleep, I washed myself with a washcloth, etc.).
At the same time, I have never been punished without being warned, my mother would always threaten me first, saying that if I did it again, I would get a beating (sometimes even after "nagging" the cook, she would just bring me the food and place it in front of me so that I could see it).
Only after I repeatedly refused to listen did I get a few slaps on the back (across my clothing).
I personally think physical discipline (in reasonable measure) is beneficial because children respond much more to actions than words.
I think it's important that part with the warning, because it gives the child the choice whether or not to listen and get punished or not.
I just needed to be warned to start listening.
The defense of the system
When the prominent Czech lawyer and constitutional judge Vojtěch Cepl was asked in 1999 what the Czech constitution meant to him – whether it was a sacred document, on which an oath is taken and which is taught in schools from an early age, or on the other hand an agreement that can be changed at any time, Cepl unequivocally chose the first option.
Once we agreed on democratic rules for our lives, which also define who we are as a state and its citizens, and changes are better managed.
And imagine: some nations have their rules even with pleasure.
As Czechs like to have dumplings with pork and cabbage, Vojtěch Cepl said at the time.
However, in recent times, more and more lawyers are voicing the opinion that the Czech Constitution needs to be changed.
The years are tested by situations that its creators (to whom Vojtěch Cepl belonged) could not predict, such as the behaviour of the directly elected president.
Cepl was right in one respect.
What we know about such documents is that political interference in their texts must be deliberate.
The institute must be understood and actively defended, only then can it be the key to dealing with most of the crises that companies face across history.
The constitution is, among other things, a kind of rule of government made up of individual rules that determine the politicians' rules of the game.
We are afraid that the power will be misused against minorities or individuals, so we are linking the bans to policies.
However, constitutional texts also allow politicians to wield their power.
Covid does not choose, several-month-old infant is fighting for its life in Brno
Although it is known that the coronavirus is milder in children, there are also severe cases that hospitals are dealing with mainly in recent times.
"We know that children are more vulnerable and affected less than adults, speaking of 2 to 5 percent compared to adults," said the head of the Department of Paediatric Anesthesia and Resuscitation of the University Hospital Brno and the Faculty of Medicine of Masaryk University Petr Dominik.
The course is much simpler, lighter, often without symptoms.
But children are those who are seriously ill with the virus, and we are seeing this particularly in recent times," added Dominik.
According to the doctor, there are dozens of children who need mild supportive care.
It is taking place at a children's infectious disease clinic.
Very seriously ill children with coronavirus are now being admitted to the ARU for the first time.
Children with post-covid syndromes have been on the ward continuously throughout the year, according to the doctor.
"Now we're seeing a surge in children with acute COVID pneumonia, which means they're having trouble breathing and need to be on a ventilator," he said, adding that the illness is affecting not just adults but adolescents and even infants.
Children are also being admitted to hospitals due to the virus.
"We currently have children aged several months and adolescents," the head of the clinic said.
However, she is pleased that the paediatric hospital in Brno has not yet recorded any deaths from the coronavirus.
According to available data, six children aged 0 to 14 died in the Czech Republic on 6 December.
According to Dominik, the psychologist is an integral part of the children's hospital - not just on the coronavirus ward.
It also points out that just like adults, vaccination also reduces the course of the disease in children and at the same time reduces the incidence of post-covid syndrome.
"That is why we recommend the vaccination dose for children as well," the doctor added.
In the quiet zone, you can only walk on marked paths.
But the quiet zones are not that big.
They are visible on the tourist map at mapy.cz.
In general, in national parks outside the quiet zone, you can walk anywhere (but don't cross the fence into the pasture).
Skiing/cycling in the forest without marked trails is not allowed anywhere unless you have an exception (but of course this is not strictly monitored outside national parks).
How does a conductor practice?
Music is in my head, Josef Kurfiřt smiles.
He was born in Liberec and originally played the woodwind.
As a singer, he can sing practically any repertoire, and as a conductor, he not only works in the F. Šalda Theatre in Liberec, but also in Pilsen, in the Josef Kajetán Tyl Theatre.
It collaborates with the Hradec Králové Philharmonic, the Film Philharmonic or the Podkrkonošský symfonický orchestr.
China builds impression of containing virus, as authoritarian regime faces crisis
Sinologist Jirouš: China is building up the impression that it has successfully contained the epidemic and that the authoritarian regime is handling the crisis better.
China has launched a health and political offensive.
Beijing has been criticized in recent months for failing to contain the outbreak, which has become a global pandemic.
Now the country is reporting zero new cases.
Countries including the Czech Republic are competing for Chinese protective equipment and Chinese doctors are helping in the fight against the coronavirus, even in the worst-hit Italy.
How to interpret Beijing's willingness?
Is it friendly support or is the communist regime trying to improve its image in the world?
He met a friend and said to him, "Don't you want an elephant?"
I have it and it's great.
The wife is happy because it eats the grass, the car is washed by its snout, and the children play with it.
It's just a parade.
If you want to buy a sloth for 5000,- I'll sell it to you.
Friend: That's it, we'll have a great time...
After some time they meet and the one who bought it complains: those voles, why did you sell me an elephant????
The lawn was mowed, everywhere there was a huge lawnmower, the car was wrecked, the children were fighting and the wife wanted a divorce.
The one who sold it says: You speak badly about the elephant, you won't sell the elephant...
World events are controlled by the powerful.
Although sovereign states are equal, it is the great powers that determine the course of international affairs.
Europe can only become such a great power if it works on its integration.
It works at the economic and political level (in certain areas), but there is still no military integration.
Personally, I think Europe is heading towards federalisation.
It won't take 10, 15 or 20 years.
But maybe in half a century things will be different and it will work out.
I thought of it and it is possible.
I'm not an expert in Czech, so I may have made a mistake.
I just assume that an ellipse usually includes 2 different units on the same level.
I'm borrowing an example from another comment "Spanish oranges and mandarins", where it's clear that both are from Spain, whereas with "Spanish fruit and mandarins", it's not clear that the mandarins are from Spain.
And I'm basing that on the fact that the sentence says "all American forces," including their weapons, and I know that American complexes are run by Americans.
In other words, I expect that it is already included in the broad concept and there is no need to specify it for the American forces.
But again, just for fun :D
Whether it's true or not, it's an unreasonable demand
An earthquake of magnitude 5 was recorded in Tokyo.
An earthquake measuring 5.0 on the Richter scale hit the Japanese capital Tokyo and surrounding areas on Sunday.
Witnesses said buildings swayed in the capital, but no damage had been reported.
No tsunami warning was issued, Reuters reported.
Vicki Holland from Britain tortured the kitten Milly
Shocking footage shows the moment the terrified monkey hunched over in a toilet bowl before her heartless owner flushed her and then laughed at her.
Hollanda also fed the parrots, kebabs and hamburgers, regardless of her actual dietary needs.
A Gwent magistrates court has now banned her from keeping animals for life, The Sun reports.
Experts in primate rehabilitation who have been caring for Milly since her abuse have said they have never seen an animal so traumatised.
Milly spent almost two years rehabilitating at Monkey World in Dorset and is now happily playing with another rescued monkey called Moon.
The mother-of-four admitted two charges of causing unnecessary suffering to a protected animal.
She was sentenced to 12 months in prison, suspended for 12 months, at Newport Magistrates' Court.
Hollanda was also sentenced to 120 hours of unpaid work, a lifetime ban on keeping animals and must pay a court fee of CZK 12,000.
Team leader Steph Sawyer said: "Milly is doing well but the rehabilitation will continue."
Milly took a while to get used to people again.
She cowered and hid from everyone she met, and any loud sound or sudden movement made her shriek.
Opička refused to eat for a long time.
Now, when she is settled and happy with the man, she can still be triggered by the sight of new people.
The psychological scars from the abuse will follow her forever, says Sawyer.
The abuse of Millie came to light after police in Gwent found sickening footage on her phone following a raid at her home over drug allegations.
In the trailer, you can hear Milly swearing.
In the second video, Holland offers the monkey cocaine and says: "Do you want some cocaine?"
That's how I like it.
In May, she admitted to possessing cocaine with intent to supply with her partner Russell Cox (43).
Cocaine worth £1,600 (around 50,000 Czech crowns) was found hidden inside Kinder eggs at his home.
Cox was jailed for 30 months and Holland was given a suspended sentence of 20 months.
And what amazing concepts do you learn from that ancient times three times in a row when you bravely jump over the whole of the 20th century?
Are you going to take the same things with you as you did in the sixth grade?
And the whole thing kills the idea of biffing, where no one cares if you can do it or understand it.
Write a test for 1 and then nobody cares.
Run and ask people in the street at random whether they can work out the nature of the roots of a quadratic equation and the coefficients.
Everyone has gone through it, and the vast majority don't even flinch and tell you they're absolutely fine.
So what is the point of this curve?
I'm a big fan of general knowledge and the fact is that people are lazy and don't want to.
And at that point, it's pointless and you'll never get it back.
It's partly learned for the many people who will need it.
But as I said, the note that you don't need to stand in front of the machine for all these facts, I thought it was absolutely serious... ...because you don't need to.
Moreover, we are getting closer to the time when not knowing is a sign of punk.
(Our communist past and sticking it to the intellectuals and the elites probably plays a part in this, but the price of that is just too high) But the price of that is just too high.
If journalists could count, then the covid probably never reached these dimensions.
At first glance: The war between Kadri and Andrey continues!
That's the main reason why Switzerland can't leave right now," Andrea answered on Instagram in her Stories to inquisitive fan questions about Kadir, who made her so angry that she decided to end all contact and even block him on social media.
Between Kadri and Andreou, it has been a struggle from the beginning of the experiment.
The main problem was that Kadri lived and worked in Switzerland and his idea was that Andrea would move, at least until he returned to the Czech Republic permanently.
But she flatly refused.
And as can be seen, their relationship did not end with love, but rather grew into mutual disrespect and hatred.
It was a planned attack! Kadri fumed back at Andreino's accusations of lying, gambling and debt.
Kadri's supposed honesty did not please his ex-wife or his younger sister Linda either.
She decided to publicly defend her brother.
I don't normally talk about things like this, and we never really talked about these things in our family.
I don't want to cause any offence.
But when I see someone trying to publicly tarnish the name of someone I love so much, it just doesn't sit right with me.
I'm sorry I have to do this this way, but I wanted to publicly thank my brother Kadri for being a character and helping our family when we needed it most, even though he was so young.
I'm more hurt when I read such false information that is probably too far removed from the context.
I would like everyone to know Kadri as I do, our friends and family, in response to Andrey's words.
I am really grateful for everything!
Of course people will believe what is written, but the most important thing is that his family loves him and knows the truth and knows what really happened, she added.
The drunk burglar climbed up the facade to the fifth floor.
You won't believe why.
His robbery spree began at a car park in a residential area, where he tried to break into several cars.
According to available information, one vehicle was stolen from one vehicle in the sum of around CZK 330.
He didn't think of anything better than to climb up to the fifth floor and enter the apartment through the open window.
He stole two bananas.
In footage from a security camera, he is then seen walking away from the scene, eating a banana.
When the owner of the apartment awoke the next morning, he discovered that the bananas were not where they were supposed to be and called the police.
He was then detained by Cchaa.
The man admitted he had been drinking on the day of the offence.
And since he needed money, he decided to rob.
The matter is currently under investigation.
The drunk climbed up the facade to the 5th floor, where he stole two bananas.
The pandemic law is time-limited and is tied to the pandemic readiness.
If it is repealed, the law will no longer be in force.
The law, however, restricts the scope of business
Is that enough for you?
The right to assemble will be restricted, but not abolished.
More than 60 percent of voters went to the polls for the local council elections on Saturday
New mayors were elected in the villages of Komňa on Uherskohradišťsko, Lužice on Mostecku, Nová Ves on Liberec and Rovná on Pelhřimovsko on Saturday.
The number of councillors in these towns has fallen below the number stipulated by law, or the elected councils have split up.
A total of 99 candidates competed for the 28 seats on Saturday.
The average age of the newly elected representatives is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69, the youngest 33.
The results of Saturday's vote will symbolically close out a fairly challenging, but successful year for us.
Four new or repeat elections to municipal councils took place in it, and the most watched election to the Chamber of Deputies was also held, said the vice-president of the Czech Statistical Office, Eva Krumpová.
She recalled that due to the COVID-19 epidemic, the elections were more demanding in terms of equipment and personnel.
In Komna in the Uherskohradišť region, the Association of Independent Candidates won the Saturday election with 27.76 percent of the vote and two seats in the seven-member council.
STAN's candidate received 24.84 percent of the vote, which also means that it won two seats.
Citizens for Komna also won two council seats, with 18.52 percent of the vote.
The current mayor of the municipality, Jana Křižková, who is a member of the Association of Private Individuals, was also elected to the council.
The Komňané - independent candidates - managed to get one seat in the council.
75.48 percent of the eligible voters cast their ballots.
The Pro Rovna association won in the village of Rovná in Pelhřimov.
It received 50.50 percent of the vote, which means four of the seven seats.
Two representatives from the Association of Independent Candidates 1 and one from the Association of Independent Candidates 2 also made it into the town council.
Turnout was 93.62 percent.
The Association of Lužice and Svinčice, led by Mayor Jindřich John, won the elections in Lužice and Svinčice again.
It received 56.73 percent of the vote and, like in 2018, will have four seats on the seven-member council.
The second place candidate, Obec pro lidi, which received 43.27 percent of the vote, will have three representatives on the council.
76.7 percent of voters cast ballots.
The independent candidates Naděje pro Novou Ves won the election in Nová Ves, Liberec.
The association of independent candidates received 59.88 percent of the votes and gained four seats in the seven-member municipal council.
ANO received 40.12 percent of the vote and increased its number of seats in the 2018 general election, and now has three.
Turnout was 42.9 percent of voters.
The State Election Commission will discuss the results of the election on Tuesday.
They will then be published in the Statutes Collection.
What do you think is the bigger problem?
A dead civilian or a foreign politician?
I think that all the things people write to you are good.
You play the idiot to make him fight with someone.
If not, then it's sad.
I do not believe that Christians are degenerates, nor anything like that.
I even like a lot of church buildings from an aesthetic point of view (which was the point, after all, to look good).
And it doesn't matter who believes in what.
On the other hand, I dislike how much power the church had in the Middle Ages, how much money they spent, how they suppressed science, etc.
Not to mention all the wars she caused, e.g. the Thirty Years' War
Tl;dr: Believe in the spaghetti monster, but the state and the church have nothing to do with each other
The man fell head first from twelve metres.
The crash survived the concrete.
The incredible fall survived a man in Ostrava on Sunday night, who was rescued by the Regional Health Rescue Service.
Staff at the regional control centre received a call at midnight on Saturday with initial information about a man who had fallen from a height.
Two ZZS crews immediately rushed to the scene – a medical and a nursing crew.
When paramedics arrived at the scene, they found the 28-year-old had fallen from a window at around 12 metres high and landed on his head on concrete!
They mined coal in Vítkovice.
But not as it should have been, and the firefighters went to the scene.
When the rescue teams arrived, the man was unconscious with multiple injuries and in life-threatening danger.
The attending physician intubated his airways, provided artificial lung ventilation, and transported him by ambulance to further care at the trauma center in Ostrava, according to a spokesman for the ZZS MS region, Lukáš Humpl.
I have greater fears than the coronavirus from inadequate public and government responses
The spread of the coronavirus in the Czech Republic is a challenge for politicians and officials, but the front line of the fight against infection is primarily doctors and medical staff.
How serious is the situation from their perspective?
We spoke to military doctor David Řezáč.
Editor: Matěj Válek Research: Tomáš Roček, sound engineer: David Kaiser, music: Martin Hůla
Legendary Nunes falls after seven years, Oliveira retains belt
MMA had a great night full of interesting results.
At UFC 269, things were happening.
The outsider Julianna Peña managed to beat the legendary fighter Amanda Nunes, who had not lost for seven years.
Charles Oliveira made short work of Dustin Poirier in the lightweight division, winning a unanimous decision to retain his belt.
Kai Kara-France also won, knocking out Cody Garbrandt with a technical knockout in the first round.
He also defeated Sean O'Malley.
A surprise that no one expected.
It brought a women's bantamweight bout between the legendary Amanda Nunes and Julianna Peña.
The American entered the bout as a sort of "wimp," as Nunes hadn't lost in seven years and was sharpening her teeth for another victory.
The beginning of the duel was also in the spirit of paper-based assumptions.
Nunes started aggressively and even dropped her opponent with a push kick.
However, Peňová was not forced to make any further mistakes and attempted to attack by grabbing the hand herself.
The second round was thrilling and very exciting for MMA fans.
Both competitors were full of praise for each other's excellent strikes and hard hooks.
Pena also knocked Nunes to the ground where she began to strangle her.
It had to give up the fight and retreat.
The American had prepared everyone for a huge shock when she became the new champion.
The main event was a battle between Charles Oliveira and Dustin Poirier for the lightweight title.
At first, Poirer did better, but the cards started to turn against him.
In the second, Oliveira tried to be more active, and his opponent tried to hit him with a punch to the hand.
It didn't work out for him, but afterwards he put a lot of pressure on his opponent, knocked him down with a flurry of punches.
Thanks to this, he won the second round.
In the third round, Oliveira showed a rear naked choke, which Poirier resisted for a while, but then had to break free.
The Brazilian defended his title, while Poirier lost after two years.
In the next bout, Sean O'Malley recorded a dominant victory over Raulian Paiva, who was knocked out in the first round with a hard right to the body.
He then went on to record his 15th victory in a row with a series of pinpoint strikes.
Kara-France then went on to beat Cody Garbrandt.
In the spring, Nunes celebrated another triumph with her little daughter, now she has lost after seven years.
That knee, or that knee?
At first glance, it doesn't seem complicated.
Most of the nouns in Czech express only one grammatical gender, so there is no problem in determining whether they are masculine, feminine or neuter.
There is also a fairly large group of nouns in which the gender is not fixed.
Such significant names are split between the two genders.
When declined, they take on double endings and in some cases remain in the uninflected form.
For example, the words "svízel" and "kyčel" are masculine and feminine, in the first they are declined according to the pattern "stroj", in the second according to the pattern "píseň".
Another group of nouns has different forms in the singular first person, for example: "row/rows", "bed/beds" or "potato/potatoes" (in the sense of food).
Both forms are standard, have the same meaning, and are therefore freely interchangeable.
Some expressions may differ regionally, for example "okurka" in Bohemia and "okurek" in Moravia, in this case the Moravian variant is ungrammatical, as are other Czech-Moravian pairs of words: "příkop" and "příkopa", "kobliha" and "koblih" and so on.
Some words that have entered Czech from other languages are originally uninflected, but they gradually acquire Czech endings.
A typical example is the word "image", which is masculine and feminine, or the word "buffet", which has remained in the middle gender and has masculine endings according to the pattern "fort".
Turkey has opened the way for migrants to Europe.
What is the situation like right on the Greek border?
Tension is growing at the Greek-Turkish border as the number of migrants trying to reach Europe grows.
Thousands of people have started to cross the southern border of the Schengen area after Ankara stopped protecting them.
European politicians promise to support Greece, and the Czech government is also preparing humanitarian aid.
What motivates refugees to take the uncertain path?
And what is the situation like on the ground?
We haven't seen blue skies for three months and we've been gasping for air, a Sydney journalist says
Four months of devastating bushfires have killed almost 30 people and hundreds of millions of animals and destroyed millions of hectares of land.
How are the authorities and the local residents dealing with the disaster?
Could the Morrison government have done more to avoid the drastic cuts that critics say it is pursuing?
And what will the country have to prepare for in the future in relation to climate change?
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks to Sydney-based journalist Ika Detrich.
False accusations have always been rare.
That is why it is always written everywhere.
It's unpleasant to deal with how sexual violence looks in our society and how widespread it is, so we try to downplay it.
I don't personally know anyone who has been wrongly convicted.
I know a lot of people who have been raped and I've seen how their communities or even the police treat them.
The victims should always be believed.
The trend has been that victims are finally opening up about their trauma.
But it's not something that a lot of people are willing to do.
There are also those who falsely accuse someone.
It's disgusting and it's pandering to all the victims of sexual assault, but by spreading the idea that "most of the accusations are false" and that it's a "trend" you're only helping the perpetrators.
Czech Republic flooded with unfinished houses, families have no money to finish
Building material prices have risen more than 30 percent in recent weeks and months.
A number of people have been left in a precarious situation.
It does not have the means to complete the construction of the family homes and the banks are refusing to increase the mortgage loans.
In addition to the cost of materials, the cost of construction work is also increasing.
That is why people do not have enough money to finish the already built family homes.
In many cases, banks refuse to increase mortgage loans, which creates extremely unpleasant situations.
In the best case scenario, people move into well-built and well-insulated homes.
In the worst case, the built houses are uninhabitable and families are forced to sell them because they cannot afford to pay their mortgages and they also have to pay rent," says BHS economist Štěpán Křeček.
We are building two to three family homes a year and fifty percent of that is happening.
As a construction company, it is difficult for us to comply with some of the terms of the contract, even though the materials have increased in price.
So we're doing it for free," said the owner of the construction company Zdeněk Slivoň.
Many people will only have financial problems.
If they had calculated that the construction of the house would cost five million, now it will cost seven.
I think some will be waiting," Slivon added.
The most expensive items were copper, iron and also the installation and heating equipment.
But construction companies are also struggling with a shortage of workers.
In the Czech Republic, there is a shortage of graduates in construction trades, and the influx of foreign workers is slowing the spread of the pandemic.
The situation regarding the issuance of building permits is currently more favourable.
"Building authorities issued 7,675 building permits in October, which is almost 10 percent more than a year ago," Křeček explained.
We are doing well and we will do even better.
But the real vision is missing, says the commentator for ČRo – myRadio
The new year has traditionally been marked by political speeches in addition to the classical celebrations.
This year, in addition to the prime minister and the head of ANO Andrej Babiš and the Christmas message from President Miloš Zeman, the nation was addressed by the president of the Senate and the speaker of the Chamber of Deputies.
What did we learn?
Just like my diploma thesis is super, I have my own topic, which I chose, I'm continuing my bachelor's thesis, I always do it for a whole year and then I write the written part for a week or two.
The state is completely calm if a person is not a total moron and something is left in his head, then the commission will not unnecessarily suffocate the theory.
I learned about the state for a week and when I was at the end, the commission always tried to lead me to some logical conclusion that I immediately grasped and I was right.
Otherwise, for those projects, I know people who pay someone to do their semester project for them (we did it many times, very useful, very educational) and then they just learn the project and have it done.
I think it's great when there's a test at the end of the subject, where the knowledge gained from the project is applied, not just defended.
But don't email or call the embassy and don't send any packages.
You'll be the same as them.
Those people at the embassy have nothing to do with it.
And if they were against Russia, they would be taking a big risk, so they might have to play with them because otherwise something could happen to them.
But you can also put up a similar statue of Putin next to the bear.
Třebas would then add something so that it reaches Xi Jinping's back or something like that.
I agree, despite Insta throwing artists under the bus.
Once you post stories every day and at least once a day a new picture, your achievements dwindle down to absolute minimum.
In addition, it changes what is more important for the function, whether likes, comments or storage.
I've been feeling pretty sore lately, so maybe I'll have to go back to Twitter where a lot of my peers are doing well and can't help but fail.
In the end, I would be happy if something more user-friendly came along that didn't rob artists of all their creativity and energy
The statement of the Labour Party in Donbass
The Union - yes, the break-up - no, they express their opinion on the break-up of the USSR.
Thirty years since the illegal break-up of the USSR.
On December 8, 1991, the biggest geopolitical disaster in the history of mankind took place.
On December 8, 1991, Boris Yeltsin, Leonid Kravchuk and Stanislav Shushkevich, without any legal authority and in violation of the results of the referendum on March 17, 1991, with an open-minded attitude towards Mikhail S. Gorbachev, secretly, regardless of the people, signed an agreement that "the Union of the Soviet Socialist Republics as a subject of international law and as a geopolitical reality ceases to exist."
One stroke of the pen "wiped out" a huge country with almost three million inhabitants.
Hundreds of thousands of ethnic Russian citizens found themselves abroad after the collapse of the Soviet Union.
Since the early 1990s, the Russian population has decreased by ten to eleven million.
Even without the loss of the Russian population of the former Soviet republics, we have already lost more people than in the two world wars combined!
Earlier, the same people who destroyed what had been built in Belovezhskaya Pushcha in one sitting, which had been created at the cost of millions of lives in World War II and the Great Patriotic War, betrayed the socialist camp (created at the cost of millions of lives in World War II and the Great Patriotic War).
Consciously they deindustrialized, slowed down agriculture, severed ties with fourteen republics that had previously been economically linked through a single mechanism.
If we look deeper, we see the impoverishment of the population, the breakdown of the economy, science, the army, the growth of crime, inter-ethnic conflicts, the war in Chechnya, all the conflicts in the post-Soviet space, the orange revolutions, the expansion of NATO to the East, the war and the break-up of Yugoslavia, the Arab Spring, the war in Syria – all this is the result of geopolitical capitulation, the surrender of the socialist camp, and then of the Soviet Union.
There is such a concept in political science as "vacuum of power".
Everything that was seized and given up was quickly filled and taken over by NATO, which accepted our geopolitical capitulation.
And the whole world is still shaken mainly by events of the late 1980s and early 1990s.
The price of a product sold in a supermarket with a large turnover does not necessarily correspond to its quality.
It's Tuesday and we have some meat in the supermarket that costs 189 Kč / kg.
I'll buy it and put it in the freezer and make it for dinner on Thursday.
In an alternative reality, where I don't buy meat on Monday, the chain will reduce it to 99 CZK/kg on Tuesday - can you explain to me the mechanism by which the price of the meat becomes a burden on my digestive system?
Or I'll wait until Thursday and the meat will be 69 CZK/kg cheaper - how does this meat differ from what I bought on Monday for 120 CZK and left in my freezer for 3 days?
I will answer myself - nothing.
These things that when something is cheap, it must be guaranteed to be bad, defected or low quality are horrendously retarded to say the least ;-)
Recently, I went to Hlavas in Brno and a lady was handing out some brochures, I always take things like that to help the volunteers, they can't get rid of it...
No, the brochure was full of common sense and conservative views of the world, but nothing about God, I was confused, but I knew it would be some kind of propaganda.
After reading it, I found out who was publishing it and it turned out to be Scientology.
No, because it was a good movie, full of completely unnecessary advice, as if I needed to wash and not be a pig.
The paper saved the forest from being cut down.
I've been through something similar with an ex-girlfriend.
Psychological manipulation and emotional blackmail will force you to do what that person wants because you like them and you don't realize how much power that situation has over you.
She threatened me a few times that she would hurt me because I went out with a guy she didn't like.
Or when I wanted to leave her apartment earlier, she begged me to not go anywhere.
Then she started physically blocking the doors.
For a year it was a great relationship, but then another half year went by and it started to fall apart.
Then I ended the relationship with her because I told her I was leaving and she lied to me but I can talk to her about it next week to calm her down and she won't do anything crazy.
Such a person sucks the city, emotions and overall joy out of you.
Better to hold back
When insurance companies are competing to buy test kits and hunt for positives, without which the deadly disease would not be known without a test.
The only thing we're achieving is complications for companies, transport companies and others, because their employees have been given five days of home detention by the random number generator.
In the West, they have stopped messing around with it and have recognised that it is not worth trying to treat an illness less famous than the common cold.
Unfortunately, Válek is new and has to put on some weight and boost his ego by inventing buzzwords.
I think we are getting back our old good shmejd.
After several years of decline and suppression of this dirty business, MLM recruitment is once again returning to the light of day.
I was one of the recruits, I tried it (I was 20, a first-year student at university), the initial promises of training in products and business skills quickly turned into "it doesn't interest you, mainly get people to work".
I was genuinely interested in the products I was selling because I wanted to help people, but the training was more about how to scare and humiliate people.
When the first paychecks came in, people quickly realized that if they wanted to make money, they had to churn out a few certain products every month.
Investment life insurance and mortgages were the only sources of income, and so he felt like a corner salesman.
What I can say is that the experience was valuable, and people learned that they should not jump to conclusions and that they should verify information.
I wouldn't put all my eggs in one basket.
People in this business are successful and even beneficial to people, but they will certainly not praise expensive consumer goods or "cheap" goods.
In the company I work for, I have not experienced such things.
HR is quiet, managers are looking after their own management and there's nothing they can do about it.
Regular evaluations are therefore taking place in some way, in the form in which it happens in our country - we set some goals for the next year, we look back at what happened and what didn't, it's more self-evaluation than someone evaluating you according to some numbers, and so on.
The company's actions are also voluntary.
But we are also a bit unique within our company - we have departments that are more "corporate".
Sometimes you feel like you're almost a startup squatting in a big corporation's office.
But it doesn't really bother us until the results come in.
The Czech woman missing in Britain has died.
Her body was found in London.
Almost ten days later, British police are still searching for a 32-year-old Czech woman who went missing at the end of November.
On Sunday 12 December, the Minister of Foreign Affairs in the demission, Jakub Kulhánek, announced on social media that a woman from Uherskohradišť was found dead.
British police have confirmed to our embassy in London this afternoon that they have found the body of a missing Czech citizen.
The cause of death is being investigated.
We will not release any additional information about the case to the family.
"I'm sorry," Kulhánek wrote on Twitter.
The last time the young woman was seen was on November 28, when she was dropped off at work by a bus and then went to withdraw money from a cash machine.
Her disappearance was reported to colleagues five days later.
She was then reported missing by the Metropolitan Police, who added her to Interpol's list of wanted people worldwide.
It was also found in the Czech database of missing people.
Police have already detained one man in connection with this.
What role he played and what he was suspected of, but she did not reveal.
In four municipalities, new councils were elected at the end of the year
On Saturday 11 December, new councils were elected in the towns of Komňa on Uherskohradišťsko, Lužice on Mostecko, Nová Ves on Liberecko and Rovná on Pelhřimovsko.
The number of councillors in these towns has fallen below the number stipulated by law or the elected councils have split up.
In the new elections, 99 valid candidates ran for 28 seats.
Turnout reached 62.41%.
The highest turnout was recorded in the village of Rovná, where 93.62 percent of eligible voters voted.
A total of 8 women and 20 men were elected.
The average age of the elected representatives is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69, the youngest 33.
A total of 13 candidate lists were registered for the new elections for the councils in the four municipalities.
Thirty-six women and sixty-three men applied for the 28 council seats.
The average age of the candidates was 46.6 years.
The youngest candidate was 22, the oldest 72.
The results of Saturday's vote will symbolically close out a fairly challenging, but successful year for us.
Four new or repeat elections to local councils took place, and the very closely watched election to the Chamber of Deputies was also held.
We had to work in more demanding epidemiological conditions, which placed greater demands on equipment and personnel security, said Eva Krumpová, 1st vice-president of the Czech Statistical Office.
The last constituency was processed on Sunday 12 December at 03:49.
On Tuesday, the results of the vote will be discussed by the State Election Commission, and after approval, they will be published in the Collection of Laws.
This is the biggest problem I have with the whole pandemic.
I struggled with the fact that I had a very dangerous contagious disease at the beginning, but it went without too many problems.
I have a problem with the way a large part of the population is acting like idiots towards it.
I'm most looking forward to being vaccinated (tomorrow!) because it means I'll finally be less dependent on other people not being idiots.
He would be stripped of the presidency and the right to run for it again.
However, the chance of that actually happening is very small.
Moreover, I am not sure whether the recording of the document could be considered a breach of trust.
Velezrada is such an act that endangers the sovereignty, territorial integrity, or the democratic character of the state.
It must have been something more serious.
How the pandemic has affected intimacy: The number of people aged 35 and under who are celibate for the whole year is rising
More and more young adults in the United States are living their lives without sex.
The majority of the victims are religious people, according to the DailyMail website.
The survey showed that from 2008 to 2021, the proportion of people aged under 35 who gave up sex rose from eight to 21 per cent.
Women aged between 18 and 35 who say they have not had sex in the last year are more than ever before.
Other factors are also contributing to the decline in the number of sexually active individuals, the Institute for Family Studies (IFS) has found.
One of them could be the economic impact of the coronavirus and the higher unemployment rate.
But the presence of the media, social networks or video games, which make sex less and less of a priority for young people, could also be to blame.
"Since 2010, the proportion of 18-35 year olds who report not having sex in the previous year has risen rapidly," said IFS researcher Lyman Stone.
For people in relationships, sexual activity is more common, with only 5% saying they had not had sex in the last year.
Among the free people, it was 29 percent. Stone added that marriage before the age of 35 is only a small percentage.
The decline in sexual activity is also due to the fear of premarital sex and religious beliefs.
Despite this, the proportion of married and cohabiting men aged under 35 who are sexually active is still falling.
Young people are divided on the issue of pre-marital sex, with around 30 per cent saying it is a bad thing, while around 70 per cent think it is okay.
"It's true that in this age group there is a minority, but their behaviour is pushing this trend," Stone says of the 30 per cent.
For the majority of those with a moral problem with premarital sex, the reason is religious.
Since 2008, the proportion of abstinence among young adults aged 18 to 35 who attend religious gatherings more than once a month has increased from 20 to almost 60 percent.
The trend has risen from 10 percent to 20 percent among the "less religious," Stone said.
Other factors contributing to the decline in sexual activity include less social interaction and, above all, increased alcohol consumption during the pandemic, he said.
The study also showed that the likelihood of sex is lower for people who are unemployed or have lower incomes.
Another reason may be the proliferation of digital media, which apparently reduces the need for sex.
People are spending more time online, which is "replacing" this need.
This trend has been driven by the lockdowns during the COVID-19 pandemic.
The whole mandate is about whether a company should force part of the population to behave in a way they don't want, but which could save their lives.
It's a pretty big question, and one I'm personally most interested in the question of social conscience.
That is, for example, the question of whether, when we don't do it and they die, it will be our fault.
My argument is that we certainly could have saved the life of an 80-year-old man who really didn't know what was going on, we didn't explain it to him, he heard some misinformation and as a result he didn't get the vaccine and he died.
On the other hand, I do not think that we can mourn the death of a staunch opponent of vaccination, who together with the SPD and the Communists is making a fuss about something to do with persecution and a totalitarian state.
From the statistics I mentioned, it is quite clear that the majority of pensioners who are not vaccinated probably belong to the second group, so they will be able to pay for it themselves.
Czechia without snow.
How does mild winter relate to drought?
This winter, so far, has brought one of the smallest snowfalls in recent years in the Czech Republic.
Ski area operators can't do without technical snow, and the weather even complicates preparations for the Jizerská padesátka cross-country skiing race.
Is it a trend or an exception?
And what will little snow mean for the fight against drought in the Czech Republic?
I have one story, but it's not about a baker.
One time in middle school, our teacher took us across the whole city to the shipyard so we could ride the boats down the river.
We walked down that wide street once, and we didn't see anyone in the middle - Hare Krishna sect followers.
Of course, they fell on us.
I was lucky to escape, but I got into a conversation with one of my friends.
When they left, we asked her what she said to them.
"They asked me if I wanted to save my soul.
I told them I didn't have a soul," she said.
Everyone, including the teacher, walked the entire route, except for the boatyard.
We're so embarrassed.
It's not much, but the system is breaking down, says Orozovič
New German Chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw on Sunday after previous visits to Paris and Brussels, where he was greeted by military honours by Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki.
"We are opening a new chapter in our relations," Morawiecki said at a joint press conference after the meeting.
Scholz stressed that Europe must make it clear that it will not accept the violation of Ukraine's territorial integrity.
The crisis caused by the disturbing movements of Russian troops near the Ukrainian border can be resolved with the help of diplomatic efforts, even within the "Normandy group", which brings together France, Germany, Russia and Ukraine.
Morawiecki said the chancellor had been informed about the situation at the Polish border with Belarus, where its leader Alexander Lukashenko has artificially created a migration crisis and uses people as living targets and weapons, as every night dozens of attempts are made to (illegally) cross the border.
He was talking to the prime minister about further sanctions to bring home to the Lukashenko regime and its Kremlin patrons that we are determined to defend the eastern border of the EU.
According to the DPA agency, Scholz assured that Warsaw is enjoying German support in its dispute with Belarus and condemned the inhumane treatment of Lukashenko's regime towards refugees.
Drunk Polish nun caused accident, tried to cover it up
The car returned to the scene of the accident, but the driver was being driven by another nun who was trying to take the blame.
When the police told her that she could lose her driving licence for failing to give way at an accident, she accepted the truth, TVN24 reported.
She admitted that another nun had hit her car and asked for help.
The police then came for Celestina's sister.
They gave her a breath test and when they discovered she had more than two per cent in her system, they immediately took her driving licence away.
She also announced that she would plead her case in court.
Hugo is doing what he can.
Juraj Šajmovič, however, did not overlook his film.
Czech creators of family comedies have looked to American stories about dog lovers.
But they forgot an important thing: the laws of the film industry.
After the sentimental film F. Brabce Gump - a dog who taught people to live, another film called Tady hlídáme my is now dealing with the emotions of cinema-goers.
The screenplay co-author and director Juraj Šajmovič Jr. continues his previous film Tady hlídám já from 2012.
The talking hedgehog Hugo returns to the stage, along with some familiar faces.
Julie and Ivan, owners of a pension in the Sumava mountains, which is about to close down, so they start taking in boarders, Julie's father and his partner, and above all her daughter Veronika.
She is no longer a little girl, but a young woman experiencing her first love.
The director and his partner, Beatriz Šajmovičová (who is also the film's producer), struggled with the narrative in the previous film, but at least the children and the dog were entertained.
This time, the creative duo have written a weaker script that provokes a mix of fear and a sense of dread.
Let's sum it up.
Although a scientist, Julie falls prey to the delusion that she is pregnant and, when the "constellation" is right, copulates with her forest engineer, Ivan, wherever the coordinates dictate - on the hood of a car or the bell tower of a church (of course during an excursion with a local guide), a retired Colonel Mojmir, despite years of training, shoots his own daughter (Julie), who falls into a coma, whereupon the family is taken to hospital so that the miraculous process of healing can take place in the heart of the Sumava wilderness.
Nothing against nature's purification and the power of animal love.
Their owners know why they have them.
The audience gasps as to how much content, full of unbelievable situations and figures, is required for this message.
Two staff thieves, a pigeon fancier competition, a Šumava charlatan, police arriving on a tip to search for "drugs", and discussing herbs with bone meal - and which roasted family in the boarding house of course gets drunk.
When the heroine awakens from a heavy coma and sits down to a cigar and a glass of dad's whisky as a recovering vegetarian, you can't help but laugh.
The creators also explain to the viewer that "it sometimes happens after a seizure."
Shajmovic's team lacks basic dramaturgical knowledge of working with text, the ability to build a plot, a sense of the characters and the point, and directing.
The performances are uneven, the editing rudderless and the overall impression bland.
While Lukáš Vaculík, Jitka Ježková and Nela Boudová try to save their parties, they have little to play with.
The only saving grace of the film are the poetic shots of the Šumava countryside taken by cameraman Vladimír Holomka and the pair of deer.
It's not enough to sketch out a few characters, a chatty plot and dog-whistles, let alone the vulgar language the characters use.
The argument is not that she is a long-standing member of the Jezebel Breeders' Club - as is the case with the producer.
To promote nature and friendship with dogs, one must also have knowledge of the craft, if one wants to tell a believable story.
This did not work out in this case.
There's a bit too much smut and minimum respect for the genre in this good family film.
Even as a piece of advertorial, this amateurish effort would not have passed muster.
Yes, respect, because they have to listen to incessant abuse from people like you.
There is a difference between offering and coercing, here you can see how you understand this, but it is only because you have never tried it.
The decision is always with the customer, if they don't want it, the answer will always be no.
If you were a kid like that, you might change your mind.
It's work like any other, in this case a gig for the take.
The near east is experiencing unusually dry months.
It is the only time of year when it rains.
"Almost complete absence of rainfall in November, as we have recorded at some stations, is unusual," the Israel Meteorological Service confirms.
For example, the village of Kfar Giladi in northern Israel reports only six percent of its long-term rainfall average for November.
The two-day rainfall was therefore more of an exception.
It's good for us.
It had been a long time since it rained.
It is also the right Christmas star, said Nazareth resident Wasim Askar.
Rainfall in Israel is almost exclusively in the winter months, and is sporadic and irregular.
The forests are dependent on the winter rains.
Without them, they are dry and prone to fire.
It is not just about forests, but also about water supplies and irrigation for farmers.
Israel's largest freshwater source, the Sea of Galilee, is this year filling up to the brim thanks to three consecutive wet winters.
Since then, the levels have fallen.
Water managers have been warning of drought for years.
"Rainfall is expected to decrease as a result of global warming and climate change," said Uri Schor, a spokesman for Israel's Water Authority, in 2018.
Israel can help with technologies such as desalination or wastewater recycling.
The poorer countries, such as Lebanon, Syria and Jordan, are worse off.
In the streets of the Jordanian capital, Amman, the number of cisterns is increasing.
Water pipes and private wells are drying up.
"This year, orders have increased by seventy to eighty percent compared to the previous two years," said driver Imád Sulejman in September.
Clashes broke out between farmers and security forces in Iran's Isfahan.
The reason for the protests was the drought.
The course of the local river was completely dry.
The region has had the driest November in many years.
Israel is preparing a military strike against Iran
Israel's defense minister said the Vienna talks did not produce "any progress" and that he had informed Washington about preparations for an attack on Iran's nuclear facilities.
Minister Benny Gantz said on Saturday that he ordered the Israeli army to prepare for a military strike against Iran, according to Jonathan Lis.
Gantz, who lives in the United States, is trying to persuade Americans to escalate their pressure on Iran, but has also informed Washington of military preparations.
During a press conference in Florida, Gantz said that the Vienna talks had not produced "any progress" and that the world powers "understand that Iran is playing with them."
About 3 years ago, this happened to me as well.
I flirted a bit and grilled him during the interview to find out what he really wanted from me.
In the end, I discovered that my suspicions about the pyramid were justified.
Because I really don't like these underpants, I stopped the lady for a moment and asked her some questions and then thanked her and left.
Feel free to tell me I'm stupid, but pyramids are pyramids and financial advisers are financial advisers.
Skiers headed for the mountains over the weekend, hoping for enough snow and good weather
The mountain resorts in the Czech Republic have seen their first big surge of interest in skiing this weekend.
After a heavy snowfall at the end of the working week, there is no shortage of snow and some ski resorts have already begun operations.
The organisers have not been deterred by the requirement to show a Covid certificate at the gates.
While ski hire firms are not complaining about a lack of interest from customers, some are reporting lower demand for their services than before the pandemic.
Thousands of people took part in running events and downhill skiing in the Liberec region over the weekend.
The skiers have been blessed with the weather, which today offered both sunshine and good snow conditions.
"We are happy that the opening weekend really started from the Friday evening skiing, when we had the first skiers on the hill," said the director of the Ještěd Sports Centre Jakub Hanuš.
Hundreds of people also headed to Jeseníky for the first weekend of the new season to try out cross-country skiing.
For example, the Ski Arena Karlov or the centre in Branná near Šumperk were opened.
The weekend attendance was very good, with around 400 people arriving on Saturday and today.
The conditions are not good.
Today the sun shone, it was minus three degrees, so it was perfect, said the representative of the ski centre in Branná, Rostislav Procházka.
Ski resort operators can only sell lift passes to people who are vaccinated or have recovered from a covid-19 infection.
People are ready for this, and they are showing the necessary documents, said René Hroneš from the Skicentrum Špindlerův Mlýn.
"We have only recorded incidents," he added.
Some rental and ski equipment shops are reporting lower interest than before the pandemic.
The interest in renting skis is fortunately high.
It's not like in previous years, but there are still enough customers, said Alexandra Bokišová from the Skiopava store in Opava.
There is greater demand in the period of the ski courses.
The managing director of the Hradec Králové company Snowbear, David Šinták, also feels that due to the coronavirus, there is not as much interest in borrowing ski equipment as there was before.
Before the pandemic, we were already almost on the verge of bankruptcy.
Compared to the period before the pandemic, we are about 50 percent, Šinták told ČTK.
People have become lazy and learned to sit at home, according to him.
On the other hand, the rental company in the Novako complex in Božský Dar is seeing a large demand.
They started renting skis a week ago, and those interested must now book them in advance.
"We start renting bikes this weekend, but people have already been calling ahead, so we expect a lot of interest, just like last year," said the manager of the site, Pavlína Novotná.
The interest in the ski school is comparable to the pre-epidemic period.
If we want successful and wealthy people to stay in the country, they must have the opportunity to live a good life here as well.
Socialist healthcare is not the place to go if you want to see a dentist or specialist doctor.
The clever and well-dressed people who don't have any money are leaving the country.
The owner of the company is not going to leave the country just like that.
But on the other hand, I completely agree.
If these people will not live well in the Czech Republic and if these people will not have a reasonable future in the Czech Republic, then they will not live in the Czech Republic.
The emigration from Hungary started when one beautiful day Orbán won, he ruled for a year and then the annual emigration rose by a few thousand.
It is naive to think that the Czech Republic can never find itself in such a position.
Another question is whether elections will take place.
If you live here, you might as well vote for some traditional V4 lunatic.
The young and educated will leave, his supporters and people whose assets cannot fit into the plane will stay.
A distressing photo!
Langmajer's blood for a beer bet?
While autumn was in full swing in the Czech Republic, the film crew of the Island, led by Jiří Langmajer (55), was enjoying the tropical weather in Thailand!
The actor posted a bloody photo of his face on social media.
Is it a real injury or is it just acting?
The London police are still looking for the missing Czech.
She was last seen hitchhiking home.
"Petrina's disappearance is completely out of character and we are becoming increasingly concerned for her welfare," Det Insp Lucy O'Connor, from Lambeth CID, said in a video appeal on Saturday.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and they just want to know where she is," she continued.
The Czech was reported missing on Sunday, November 28, around 7.45pm, leaving work and heading home to the Camberwell area.
She was reportedly last seen on the bus about half an hour later.
Her disappearance was reported by one of her colleagues on December 3.
Srncová worked as a "healthcare assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust, according to British media.
"We are extremely concerned for our dear colleague Petra, who is missing," a group of healthcare facilities said in a Twitter post.
"We would appeal to anyone with any information which may assist in the investigation to contact police," the statement continued.
The public is also being urged to come forward in the case by Labour MP Harriet Harman, who made the call at a press conference on Saturday.
"She's been missing for days, she's only 32, she's from the Czech Republic, her parents are understandably devastated," the Labour MP said, holding up a photograph of the woman released by the Metropolitan Police.
"I feel we all have a particular responsibility to try and find her because she was out of her home country, away from her family and working for our health service," Ms Harman said.
Police have already detained one man in connection with the incident, who remains in custody.
However, the BBC news website has reported that the police have not released any information about his identity or what he is suspected of.
Russia is not capable of occupying Ukraine, and certainly not with 30 BTG (i.e. ca. 5 divisions).
I do not underestimate Ukraine either.
They are not "huge numbers," but about 8 percent of the Russian army.
Notice that Ukraine is constantly repeating that the threat of an invasion is exaggerated and that our entry is full of teeth.
I quoted above.
I don't know what he concluded that Russia wants a war.
War is a costly hobby and Russia has the GDP of Italy.
Comparing it to the situation in 38 is in so many ways that I don't even know where to start.
I can compare it with the first Punic War and the "annexation" of Sicily :D
I can imagine that after Ukraine announced that it would not abide by the Minsk agreements, Russia would annex these crazy republics.
That's all there is to it and that "concentration" at the borders would correspond to that.
On the other hand, pacta sunt servanda...
New traffic regulations come into force in Prague from Sunday, mainly affecting suburban services
Travellers in Prague's integrated transport system (PID) are set to face a number of changes from Sunday, which mainly affect suburban services.
New lines were created, some changed their route, and others disappeared.
Mladoboleslavsko is now being integrated into the integrated system.
In the capital, express trains from České Budějovice stop at Zahradní Město station on Sundays.
The S7 suburban train will run on the route from Prague to Český Brod, which will pass through the Prague main station.
The recently opened station Praha-Zahradní Město will now be served by the R17 fast train from České Budějovice and Benešov.
PID is expanding into new areas.
In addition, buses will run to Světlá nad Sázavou, Blatna u Jesenice, Staré Splavy and Turnov.
Buses will be added to the Mladoboleslav region, including lines that extend to Liberec and Hradec Králové.
77 lines will be abolished, 37 new ones will be introduced and the operation of 12 existing ones will be improved.
The new bus line 405 will leave from Zličín in Prague and go all the way to Žatec.
A new direct connection Prague – Kralovice u Rakovníka has also been established, which replaces the cancelled S53 train line.
The services will be increased in the morning peak and on weekends, when a new express line number 404 will start running.
The lines 400 and 410, which run to Liberec, have now been included in the PID system.
They will depart from Střížkov metro station, not from Nádraží Holešovice station.
The main line 400 runs through Mělník, Dubu and Česká Lípa to Nové Bor and selected services continue to Rumburk or Cvikov.
The 410 supplementary line goes through Mělník, Dubá, Doksy, Mimoň and Jablonné in Podještědí.
On the other hand, the new operation has been cancelled or restricted on dozens of local tracks in Central Bohemia, including to Mochov, Dobříš and Rožmitál pod Třemšínem.
All trains leaving Prague at 02:30 have been cancelled.
Due to the modernisation of the railway, long-term restrictions are still in place on the Prague – Beroun, Prague – Lysá nad Labem and around Kolín lines.
Travellers are also in for changes at other locations.
Buses will replace some of the cancelled railway lines or extend the line 420 from Dobříš with a connection to Prague, where PID tickets can be used up to Milevsko.
The changes affected the lines 540 to 543 in Nymburk and the routes of some buses on the border of Central Bohemia and Hořovice in the Plzeň region.
Healthy lunch/snack from the supermarket to the office
Hello, I work 9-5 with a 30min break and my only option to get food is to walk to Billy or a bit further to Lidl.
As I have no movement, I don't have the energy to train after work, so I have to eat as healthily as possible and diet.
Unfortunately, I never know what to buy and in a hurry I buy a pizza and yogurt and an apple.
Question: What healthy food would you recommend I buy in a supermarket?
Not everyone is waiting for a metre of snow like you, unfortunately.
And it's not the trees you have to see.
Only the top of the tree can be hidden in the snow.
If it is damaged, the tree may be more susceptible to fungal infections.
I don't think it's the only reason they ban us from riding on the roads, but it's one of them.
Dary's confession on Nedved's relationship: I was not at all looking for this
The Czech showbiz pond has been alive with nothing but the revelation of the relationship between Dara Rolins and Pavel Nedved since Friday.
They have been together since the summer, and the famous footballer even divorced his singer girlfriend.
Dara then sent a lengthy message to her fans, explaining why she kept her love for them a secret for so long.
"I can say that no one in the Czech Republic or in Slovakia has escaped the fact that Dara caught a bear, sorry, Nedved," Dara Rolins, who is in love with the most successful Czech football player up to her ears, jokes.
However, he did not deny it, on the contrary.
Three days are the focus of attention, and although they are used to it, they do not enjoy it.
And it is here.
What we didn't have, but knew would happen, continues the singer.
I just don't know who is worse.
If you don't care at all, and it bores you, or us, whose lives it completely destroys.
As if someone wanted to hear your opinion on whether you get along well with your husband or girlfriend, or whether you insist that everyone knows in detail the list of your former partners and are familiar with the list of your mistakes and errors.
That's what you want, dear, it's a shame.
The pair reunited in Italy, where Rollins was jetting to for the launch of her new fashion collection.
Nedvěd has also been vice president of the Juventus football club for a long time.
The truth only came out now because they were waiting for Nedved's divorce to be finalized.
Ivan and his wife have been separated for three years, but they have only been officially divorced for three weeks.
To those who are happy with us and wish us well, we thank you.
We are just people, we have families, children, past and dreams.
We're not perfect, but I think we both have our hearts in the right place.
I love my new man just as much as he loves me and I love him just as much as he loves me.
Hello, everyone else has probably said all the important things already, but I just confirm that the halls are great until the beginning, my classmates mostly got to know each other and became friends during the first semester or two and found accommodation together, which I think is the best option as you know who you'll be living with.
Most of the apartments are not advertised for very long, so you probably won't find many of them now, but it's worth taking a look at the listings just to see what's out there.
Cejlu, and the surroundings (streets like Vranovská, Francouzská, etc., are pretty bad addresses), and some parts of Žižkov are a bit of a ghetto.
On the other hand, Veveří is a very student-friendly area, and Králův pole and that direction is great, except that it's close to the majority of VUT faculties (I don't know which one you're going to).
I have never looked for a rental, but I am a native of Brno, so I may be able to advise you on Brno as such, if you need any information.
But that's just normal thinking for me.
Because of what a number of doctors somewhere in Poland have decided to do, it is actually perfectly fine that the state does not sufficiently fund some schools.
Either learn what they want and pay for it themselves, or go by the state and pay the state.
We cannot allow private actors to control education just because they add a few crowns to the full state subsidy and thereby allow children to be taught what they want in schools.
Such claims, however, lose some of their weight when they are made by someone who, two days earlier, had expressed support for a petition drive calling for a boycott of the totalitarian state:
So, the vote against whether someone should go for an abortion is the same as the vote against whether a statue should be put up in the square?
I would consult with the person who hired you directly about that.
Otherwise, I have already experienced that (and even long-term professionals) that it either goes in one eye or they write something like xxx *** or ... (according to convention) and add a note that it is unreadable.
The truth is that in this case it is quite readable, so I would not recommend it at all.
I would deal with it personally, depending on which program you're using.
If you want to be a good and diligent student, you can look up some sign language databases and find the nearest one.
But because it looks like you're quoting from a book, I would guess that the author or the printer has simply created their own mark that sits alongside what is physically on the coin.
PS: It's not a coincidence that it's called the OdryNská říše (kingdom) rather than the OdryNská?
PSS: Someone has already made a mess of it here.
Check out the comment with ΦΙΛH
Politicians don't know what the "theme" of our presidency will be.
That's much worse than having interpreters with them.
The idea that something would be approved because no one understood the text is laughable.
All the important approved documents are examined word by word, just like some basic knowledge of English isn't enough, it's a lawyer's job.
Hundreds of translators and interpreters work in various EU institutions, and English is better suited for informal contacts, building unusual relationships.
And with the English, it's quite interesting after leaving the EU.
I don't understand the hate for Chile.
I have been working there for three years now and I am completely at ease.
How many times have I driven home from work at 10pm and never had a problem.
That it is a ghetto can only be said by someone who has not walked through it in their life.
Yes, most of the Roma population of Brno lives there, but they only do one thing and that is to block the sidewalk and park wherever they want :D it is not that I would be afraid to walk on the street there at night.
So if you're looking for relatively cheap accommodation with good access to the centre, I'd be happy to go there.
There are now new or newly renovated apartments there.
Felix Slováček (78) without Dáda and Gelemová as a stake in the ground!
Where will you spend Christmas?
Most people lit their first Advent candle on Sunday, but Felix Slováček did not.
I don't have a Christmas wreath, so there was nothing to light.
I saw Dády's wreath and Lucie definitely has one too, said the saxophonist, who confirmed Patrasová's words that he often visits her.
He visits, but does not live in their home in Vinohrady, where Dada remained alone after his departure.
The Slovak still doesn't know where he will be on Christmas Eve.
Recently we met with Anička, Felix and both grandchildren.
VIDEO: Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: AGAIN TOGETHER!
Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
But we still talked, so Christmas didn't happen.
I really don't know where I'll be.
I buy gifts all the time, and I'll definitely get Lucia and Dádě something, maybe a perfume.
I'm a gentleman, added Felix, who himself came up with the idea for the music video for the Richman club.
I'm here alone, but I don't feel alone.
I always find someone to talk to, says Slováček, who was happy to meet the wife of Ludek Sobota, Adrian, or singer Kamila Nývlt.
And he was very clear about it.
And we are an island, so why can't we have soldiers and weapons?
I don't think anyone is going to defend us and our location is so strategic that the aggressor would have to be a complete idiot not to occupy that territory.
And I don't understand why that should be a bad argument, so can you explain that to me?
I don't know of any other component that could be deployed in a crisis in hospitals.
There are few police officers and they can't afford to do it, so firefighters and nowhere else have such a high percentage of medically trained people at such a level.
And that our army is capable of defending Ostrava is a head above the previous governments, not the army, which has been asking for new toys for too long.
Record drought in the Czech Republic.
It is necessary to change agricultural subsidies, the journalist says, because the countryside is not just a food factory.
The Czech Republic is going through the worst drought in years.
According to scientists, water levels have dropped in mountainous and sub-mountainous areas, and smaller amounts of rainfall have also been recorded in places where there has never been a water shortage.
The drought that is affecting large parts of Central Europe is caused by climate change.
However, the impact is also heightened by the way we work with the soil.
What should we prepare for in connection with the drought?
And how can we help nature in difficult times?
That's how it should be, as long as I keep my skates on the ice, mushrooms know how to play hockey, and that tactic (which I tried in Franchise Hockey Manager) is also overall haluz.
And whether you're the "bear of Russia" or the "lama of China," losing by two goals even if you don't have to win is different than when you're tied.
But as I listen to the Czech commentators who pick out what the referees miss, whether it's in men's or women's hockey, it's all crazy, but that's how it is with all sports, UEFA and "Italian actors" or motorsport F1, WRC, etc.
The controversy is everywhere.
And if it were the other way around, it would be the same as always, and that Czechia has lost more often than won, so it would be a classic "they lost" vs "we won".
Coronavirus: Russia's coronavirus cases exceed 10 million
On Saturday 11 December, the Czech Republic recorded 9080 daily cases.
5766 people have been hospitalized.
A total of 34,451 people died in the Czech Republic, and another 74.
The number of confirmed cases in the Czech Republic in the last 14 days is 1967 per 100,000, and 871 per 100,000 in the last week.
The number of cases in Russia on Sunday exceeded 10 million.
In the last 24 hours, 29,929 new cases have been registered.
It is the lowest daily figure since October 13.
The total number of registered cases in Russia is 10,016,896.
The daily death toll is 1,132, the lowest since the end of October.
Britain is facing an "inevitable" surge in cases driven by Omicron, said Dr Susan Hopkins, chief medical adviser to the UK Health Security Agency, on television on Sunday.
New quarantine measures will be required.
People infected with the Omicron variant are already being hospitalised in Britain and Hopkins expects their numbers to grow.
So far, no one has died from omicron, but hospitalizations are about 14 days after infection and deaths are about three weeks after infection.
Labour leader Keir Starmer said on Sunday that Boris Johnson probably broke the law by holding a Christmas quiz in Downing Street last December, when a lockdown was in place and Christmas parties were banned.
One of Johnson's ministers defended the quiz as "virtually" taking place over a computer.
But they were joined by a group of Downing Street staff gathered around computers.
Pressure is mounting on Johnson to resign as Prime Minister in the UK.
Last December, when a strict lockdown was introduced in London and Christmas parties were banned, Johnson's ministers went ahead with numerous Christmas parties despite the lockdown.
The British public and media are furious that Johnson and his government have been laughing at them:
Paul Brand, editor of ITV's commercial television channel for Britain: Two years ago today Boris Johnson won a landslide victory in the general election.
Today, the Conservative Party is talking about the need to remove him from the post of prime minister.
Remarkable how quickly the events unfolded.
Do you want to turn and save your skin?
Hungarians are set to vote in spring elections that could end Viktor Orban's 12-year rule.
They will be elections of global significance.
How fair can they be?
They won't be fair.
They will probably not be free either, because they were not free in the last two elections under Orbán.
His party, Fidesz, controls the media, changes electoral districts to benefit from it, and does other small or large tricks.
The latest is that everyone can in practice vote where they want.
This would allow Fidesz to transport voters from certain districts to those where the outcome is uncertain and where the opposition could win.
So I'll just reiterate that there won't be any.
Do you think it will be the same as in 2014 and 2018?
After all, the situation is very different.
It was no longer about whether Fidesz would win, but how much and whether it would have a constitutional majority.
Now there is a real chance that the united opposition will get more votes and seats.
This is a big surprise for Viktor Orbán and his party.
Will they play harder to keep the power?
Yes, we have some indications that they are ready to go beyond what they have done so far.
Recently, a recording of the speaker of the parliament and one of the leaders of Fidesz, László Kövér, leaked to the independent media, in which he explains to the heads of the secret services that the opposition is a threat to national security.
Those are the hints of a new approach you are talking about?
Yes, that is one of the new things.
It all starts with language.
I was bit quite often, the last time when I was 14, my mother doesn't have much patience, neither do I, my aunt has it for a long time, but then she bites extremly (only in connection with me).
At the same time, I was very temperamental and I was crying like a little girl, to the point where I was lying on the ground in a fetal position and was completely blue, they put me under the shower about 2 times to calm me down.
Sometimes they would lecture me, sometimes it was more that they didn't know.
I definitely have a tendency to solve things with violence, as I was a bit of a scamp as a child, now I have to hit something to get it out of my head (so I don't get too carried away), so never anything extreme, but always that urge to mum.
I'm not able to determine to what extent that is my impulsiveness, but I'm sure that education also has a part to play in it.
I fear that I will also lose patience with my children and deal with it in the same way.
I think hitting children is just wrong and that my parents shouldn't have done it, especially not in that moment when it wasn't "educational," but out of frustration, on the other hand, every parent does something like that, so I don't blame them for it.
It doesn't bother me, I don't understand why the OP should feel ashamed.
Laws should be clear and unambiguous.
I would call them the laws in such quality.
Otherwise, I'd be interested to know if you're worried about losing income?
Can we really count on the fact that people want and buy the product and that you will have something to hypothecate to pay for it?
Kočner's outrageous world.
Where will Slovakia move the process with the murder of journalist Kuciak?
The main trial in the case of the murder of Ján Kuciak and Martina Kušnírová begins in Slovakia.
The death of the investigative reporter and his partner changed Slovakia.
It also exposed the practices of the accused businessman Marian Kocner and his connections to the top of Slovak politics and justice.
What will the process mean for Slovakia?
This is a huge amount of money for journalists.
How is it possible that this petition had far more media attention than the counter-petition of all the deans of the medical faculties, which came out the next day, two days later?
Well, they let themselves go and the company let them go.
Covid was already on Czech television half a year ago.
Another government ends and the law on the involvement of municipalities in the selection of a storage site nowhere
The minister's proposal needs to be fundamentally revised
The government of Prime Minister Andrej Babiš is nearing its end, and the law that was supposed to ensure respect for the interests of municipalities and their citizens in the selection and licensing of a high-level radioactive waste repository is still not in place.
The government's legislative council has suspended debate on the proposal, which the Ministry of Industry and Trade submitted to the government after years of delays.
However, its content is in serious conflict not only with the affected municipalities, which are part of the Platform Against Deep Mining, but also with the Association of Municipalities and Towns of the Czech Republic.
The authorities expect to strengthen their options when deciding on a repository, which has been promised to mayors since 2011, when the first work on this legislation began and which is required by the Czech nuclear law and the European directive.
We expect the new government to revise the proposal in line with its coalition agreement in cooperation with municipalities.
The draft law proposed by Minister Karel Havlíček, which the Platform has at its disposal, is criticised by municipalities in particular: The proposed level of involvement of municipalities and the public in the decision-making process on the selection of a site for a repository is inadequate and cannot guarantee respect for the interests of municipalities and their citizens.
It can only be truly effective if the community or the public can influence whether the process goes ahead in a particular location.
This can be achieved by requiring the Deposit Authority to obtain the consent of the affected municipalities before commencing a specific proceeding.
The draft proposal almost completely ignores public involvement and makes the citizens of the municipalities practically mere statistics in the licensing process.
The proposal lacks system settings for compensation for municipalities throughout the search and selection process for a storage site, its approval and operation.
Representatives of the municipalities do not have many options when it comes to defending the interests of their citizens when looking for a place to store waste.
In some licensing proceedings, they may make representations or appeal, but the decision is made by the authority or the minister in whose interests the licence is to be granted.
Any appeal does not have a suspensive effect on the carrying out of exploratory or construction works.
The platform's call for more devolved decision-making is a principle that is widely used in many democratic countries, and certainly in those that have gone furthest in licensing stores, such as Sweden and Finland.
The draft law is another failure of the state administration, which hires external legal firms to draft legislation.
In this case, it is a contract with the law firm HAVEL & PARTNERS s.r.o., which SÚRAO concluded and which follows on from contracts with lawyer Jan Zemánek.
The total sum for these works, according to the register of contracts, is almost 4 million crowns.
Antonín Seknička, the local councillor for the village of Cejle from the Hrádek locality and spokesman for the Platform Against Deep Storage of Radioactive Waste said: "After the ministers of industry, who rubber-stamped the position of local authorities vis-à-vis state authorities when looking for a deep storage facility for highly radioactive waste, we are expecting a more significant change from the new government."
We are also offering a helping hand.
We also thank the Association of Municipalities and Towns for their support, which views the issue of insufficient rights of municipalities for such a fundamental building in the same way as the directly affected municipalities in selected locations.
The Deep Storage Platform brings together 51 members (35 municipalities and towns and 16 associations) with the aim of changing the state's approach to dealing with spent nuclear fuel and other radioactive waste, which will not be limited to the deep storage facility.
The platform further states that decisions on the selection of a location for possible storage should be conditional on the prior consent of the affected municipalities.
John Goodman's (69) fear of the gym has been overcome: He has lifted 90 kg.
While he didn't need to change his lifestyle for many years, doctors eventually scared him.
They told him that if he did not recant, he would die.
And that was it.
Goodman has gradually lost 90kg, which is half his original weight of 180kg, The Sun reports.
He celebrated his new character at the premiere of the animated series The Freak Brothers in Los Angeles.
The guy from the Roseanne sitcom is a completely different person!
John liked to joke that his friends and family had begged him to lose weight because his big body was causing furniture to break.
"I've got everything in my mouth," the actor said in an interview with AARP in 2018.
This time I wanted to do it slowly.
To fight, to train.
I'm getting to the age where I can't afford to sit still, said Goodman, whose transformation is amazing.
It also depends on what kind of boss you are and what you want to use the word "boss" for.
If it's a text on a platform that expects readers from a gaming environment, I wouldn't translate it.
If it were a formal text or perhaps a university text, I would look for a more detailed explanation or description.
There are more types of bosses.
For example, a game like Dark Souls has several bosses, and yes, a boss is something like a lord or ruler of a level, and then there is the final boss...
Many games have hidden bosses (super boss, hidden boss), who are not necessary to beat to complete the game or level, but are often stronger than the standard boss.
Then there are games like Half-Life, where the bosses are there, but you don't actually fight them (Tentacle, Gargantua), and you can't really call them anything?
And then there are the mini-bosses.
It's a one-syllable word in any language that you can think of, Czech included (interestingly, Catalan has a word for "boss" that is the ultimate rival).
It's basically for the story or the game in general, computer-controlled, stronger than all the previous ones and watching the completion of some level or task.
The whole world is looking for the lost Petre from London.
The Czech police were also involved.
British police have been searching for missing Peter Srncova since December 3.
The Czech police are also involved in the search.
The 32-year-old woman from Uherskohradišťsko has been missing since 7 December.
Interpol also helps the British police.
Czech Petr Srncová was last seen by her colleagues on November 28.
British police have been searching for her since December 3.
Interpol issued a so-called yellow notice for her.
Peter is looking for the whole world.
"The Czech police cooperate closely with the British police," confirmed police spokeswoman Kateřina Rendlová.
"We are sharing information about the case," she added.
The search for Peter has also been announced on the police website.
He says she is 168 centimetres tall, is plump and has brown eyes and long straight hair of the same colour.
She was from Uherskohradišťsko.
Petra worked as a nurse in one of London's hospitals.
Her friends and colleagues are worried about her disappearance, as such disappearances are very unusual
Ms Harman was also involved in the search for Mr Petre.
She got involved in putting up posters with Petra's face on them.
"We have huge concerns about it," she said at a press conference on Saturday.
In connection with the disappearance, British police have already detained one suspect.
However, it is not clear who he was talking about and what he had in common with Petra.
Pre-Christmas Czech Republic terrorises Agent Tesla.
While data in October showed a slight decline in the number of attacks, the past month has seen a marked uptick in attacks as the end of the year approaches.
We have noted a large campaign in connection with Agent Tesla on November 18.
The attacks are aimed at the Czech Republic.
The attackers' strategy remains the same.
The infected attachment in the email will catch the user's attention with a name that refers to payments and financial transactions.
While last month, the dangerous attachment had the word "invoice" in its name, this time it was marked as "Copy of Invoice for 11.2021...exe," said Martin Jirkal from Eset.
Spyware contains functions that scan Internet browsers and other programs, such as Microsoft Outlook email clients, Mozilla Thunderbird or Yandex.
The malicious code actively seeks out stored login credentials, which it then sends to the attackers.
The last strong campaign took place in the Czech Republic in late August and early September, and with the approaching holidays and the end of the year, the activity of the attackers is growing again.
In November, the spyware Formbook remained active.
In contrast to the Tesla attack, the attackers in this case did not specifically target the Czech Republic and security specialists in November caught more of a global campaign.
Compared to Formbook figures in October, it has slightly weakened, but it is still well over a fifth of all detections.
The attacks continued throughout the month with increased activity on the 3rd, 10th and 15th of November.
The formbook contained the most common attachment with the suffix .exe, which was called REQUEST FOR SPECIFICATION.
But the account name is still cropping up.
The attachment in Czech could be far more dangerous for a Czech user.
Security analysts have noted a significant drop in activity for the Fareit program, which accounted for 1.6 per cent of attacks and had no major attack campaigns in the Czech Republic in recent months.
Today's tech-savvy idiot who doesn't need oxygen because oxygen is for vaccinated idiots.
The Prague parade was bigger than the media report.
According to the parade route and my experience as a protester, I would estimate around 10,000 people.
People in the procession filled the banks and the opposite bank road.
That means that a lot of people really care.
A spontaneous throng of about 4,000 demonstrators is joined by an unprecedented number of bystanders.
I say that something new is being born here, writes Radek Mokrý.
The long-term dissatisfaction of several large groups or strata of the population led to the emergence of a common language.
Even the anti-vaxxers, anti-mosquito people and the like would not be able to fill such a crowd, nor pay for it.
The Chcípl pes campaign is gaining popularity, reminding me of Million Moments for Democracy.
Sometimes I have the impression that they rent the same podium and equipment.
It is hard to say what movement could be made from this discontent, as it depends not only on the supply of money, but also on whether the three-dose vaccine from Pfizer becomes a four-dose vaccine.
It won't be a leftist or centrist movement, get that through your head.
A three-dose vaccine is almost certainly going to become a four-dose vaccine, because it's clear we'll have to get re-vaccinated every six months.
I am very glad that the vaccines saved us.
A brilliant act of science, which humanity has every right to be proud of.
End of the road, Bulgaria has a new prime minister heralding change
Bulgarian President Rumen Radev has tasked the formation of a new government to Kirill Petkov, leader of the anti-corruption movement Continuing the Change, which won the November elections.
He has managed to put together a broad coalition government that should take office in a matter of days.
The political crisis in the country has been ongoing since April, when the previous government lost the election in the face of anti-corruption protests.
However, the winning parties failed to reach an agreement on fighting corruption and abuse of power, so there were still two early elections.
What do cats do when nobody's watching?
The "secretly" recorded footage is a global hit.
Concerns have grown in Britain over the fate of the 32-year-old Czech woman who has been missing in London for several days.
Petra Srncová was last seen two weeks ago when she was heading home from work in the southern part of the British capital.
She has been called by police and her former employer, as well as her MP, who represents part of London where she lived.
"Petrina's disappearance is completely out of character and we are becoming increasingly concerned for her welfare," Det Insp Lucy O'Connor, from Lambeth CID, said in a video appeal on Saturday.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and they just want to know where she is," she continued.
The Czech, who was reported missing on Sunday 28 November at around 7.45pm, is believed to have left work and headed home to the Camberwell area.
She was last seen about half an hour later on a bus.
Her disappearance was reported by one of her colleagues on December 3.
Srncová worked as a "healthcare assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust, according to British media.
"We are extremely concerned for our colleague Petra, who is missing," a group of healthcare facilities said in a Twitter post.
"We are appealing to anyone who may have any information which could assist in the investigation to contact police," the statement continued.
An anonymous person has accused the Šumperk amateur children's room painter Zdeňka Dvořáková Kocourková (also a regional pirate councillor) of infringing copyright with her paintings.
However, the court ruled that Krtečka's paintings in the Šumperk rooms do not violate the law.
In Ústí nad Labem, a month-long hole in the road was filled in with a channel without a lid.
It was life.
The magistrate referred the complaint to the Road Safety Department, which owns the road, but the hole got bigger because it did not respond.
Eventually, the authorities clarified responsibility and ownership, and after a month, the RSD "intensively dealt with the situation."
